CORPORATE POLICY AND GUIDANCE 

 

PEOPLE AND DEVELOPMENT 

 

Pay Policy Statement 

April 2018 - March 2019 

 
 
 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 Full Council – 21st February 2018 

 

Issue 7 

 

 

CONTENTS 

 ............................................................................... Page 

3 

3 

3 

4 

5 

5 

6 

6 

7 

7 

7 

7 

7 

8 

8 

9 

9 

9 

9 

9 

10 

2 

SECTION   
 
Purpose of the Policy 
 
Background 
 
Legislation relevant to Pay and Remuneration 
 
Pay Structure 
 
Definitions  
 
Chief Executive Remuneration 
 
Chief Operating Officer Remuneration 
 
Head of Service Remuneration 
 
Recruitment of Chief Executive and Chief Officers 
 
Salary upon Appointment  
 
Performance-related Pay 
 
Relationship between Chief Executive/Chief Officer Pay  
and other Employees 
 
Lowest Paid Employees 
 
Termination Payments 
 
Employer Pension Contribution 
 
Employee Pension Contribution 
 
Re-employment / Re-engagement of former Chief Officers 
 
Gender Pay Gap 
 
Publication of the Policy 
 
Review of Pay Policy 
 
Appendices  

 

February 2018 

 

BURNLEY BOROUGH COUNCIL 

 

PAY POLICY STATEMENT – 2017 

 
Purpose of the Policy 
 
1.  Under section 112 of the Local Government Act 1972, the Council has the “power to 
appoint officers on such reasonable terms and conditions as the authority thinks fit”.  
The purpose of the Pay Policy Statement is to: 

•  maintain a transparent approach to the setting of the pay of the Council’s 

employees; 

•  comply with the requirements of the Localism Act 2011, Section 38- 43 Pay 

Accountability 

 

The policy details: 

• 
• 
• 

the methods by which salaries of all employees are determined; 
the details of the remuneration of its senior employees, i.e. Chief Officers; 
the relationship between the salary of its Chief Officers and other employees. 

 
Background 
 
2. 

The Localism Act 2011 – (Chapter 8 - Pay Accountability) requires all local authorities 
to set out its position on a range of issues relating to the remuneration of its 
employees. 

 
3. 

 
4. 

This Statement will reflect where appropriate, relevant aspects of other already 
existing personnel policies, such as pay policies, which detail the Council’s 
agreements on pay for those employees both on the National Joint Council (NJC) 
and the Joint National Council (JNC) terms and conditions and whose jobs have 
been evaluated using national agreed job evaluation schemes. (Appendix B and C) 

The Statement must be approved by Full Council, by the end of March each year and 
then be published on the Council’s website – www.burnley.gov.uk 

 
Legislation relevant to Pay and Remuneration 
 
5. 

In determining the pay and remuneration of its employees the Council will comply 
with all relevant employment legislation.  This includes the Equality Act 2010 and the 
Part-time Regulations 2008.  The Council will ensure there is no pay discrimination 
within its pay structures and that pay differentials can be quantified through the 
application of its job evaluation schemes.  Under the Equality Act 2010 (Specific 
Duties and Public Authorities) Regulations 2017 the Council will also publish 
information to demonstrate how large the pay gap is between male and female 
employees. 

 
6. 

The Council operates the NJC Scheme for all posts not defined as a Chief Officer.  In 
June 2017 the salary of the post of Chief Executive was re-assessed by utilising the 
external expertise of the North West Employers’ Organisation, which includes 
comparative benchmarking data from other local authorities and was unchanged.  
The posts of Chief Operating Officer and Head of Service have been evaluated using 
the Local Government Association’s Senior Manager Job Evaluation Scheme. 
 

February 2018 

3 

 
Pay Structure 
 
7. 

8. 

 
9. 

The Council complies with the nationally negotiated spinal column points for all posts, 
with the exception being those senior level posts referred to within the Statement.  
The salary grades that the Council applies for all other posts are at Appendix A.  This 
was revised in April 2013 to implement the Foundation Living Wage (FLW) removing 
national spinal pay points 5 – 9.  Spinal point 10 was also removed in April 2016.  In 
November 2017 the FLW was increased from £8.45 to £8.75/hour which the Council 
will implement from April 2018 in line with local agreements. 
 
The Council adopts the national pay bargaining arrangements in respect of its 
employees’ remuneration, including any revisions to the national pay spine, for 
example through agreed annual pay increases negotiated through collective 
bargaining between the national Employers and Trade Unions.  The exception would 
be the lowest pay point which is based on the FLW.  The national pay award for 2018 
and 2019 on all posts is anticipated but is still subject to consultation and final 
agreement.  The outcome may result in a further review of the Grade 2 pay points 
and salary levels 

The pay and grading structure for the majority of posts, including other pay related 
allowances, was established as part of the NJC Pay Policy approved by Council in 
2006, further revised in 2010, in 2013 and in 2016.  This Policy was developed as 
part of the Council’s approach to the job evaluation of posts and the harmonisation of 
key terms and conditions of employment.  Since 2006 all newly created posts and 
post variations are subject to evaluation against the nationally agreed Job Evaluation 
Scheme. The current policy is at Appendix B.  

 

10.  The pay and grading structure for Chief Officers, other than the Chief Executive, 

(approved by Full Council from April 2012), is made up of three bands with a single 
pay point in each band.  In establishing the salary structure for Chief Officers, the 
Council applied the nationally agreed Senior Manager Job Evaluation Scheme and 
referred to the most relevant median salary, in terms of local authority population and 
type, as required under the Chief Officer terms and conditions of employment.  It 
sought and received independent external advice on the relevant pay data to be used 
from the Local Government Association.   

11. 

In December 2016 Council approved a revision to Band 1 of the Chief Officer Pay 
Policy following a management restructure resulting in the deletion of two Director 
posts, replaced with one Chief Operating Officer.  The revised salary was agreed 
following an external job evaluation and receipt of median benchmark pay data. 

12.  Following the management restructure detailed in para 11 during 2017 duties and 

responsibilities of head of service posts were updated and job evaluations were 
externally and independently reviewed and salaries benchmarked.  As a result the 
median salary levels in Band 2 and 3 were reset. 

13.  On occasion, although not currently, it may be necessary to take account of external 

pay levels in the labour market in order to attract and retain employees with particular 
skills, knowledge and experience.  On such occasions the Council will ensure the 
requirement for such is objectively justified by reference to clear and transparent 
evidence of relevant market comparators, using data sources available from within 
the local government sector and outside, as appropriate.  Any supplement that would 
take a salary above £100,000 would require the approval of Full Council. 

February 2018 

4 

 
Definitions  
 
14.  The Localism Act 2011 refers to the position of Chief Officer defined as: the Head of 

Paid Service; Statutory Chief Officers; non-statutory Chief Officer posts and their 
direct reports (Deputy Chief Officers).  It should be noted that this definition is very 
broad, and takes account of Metropolitan and County Councils as well as District 
Councils 

15. 

It is considered that the posts the term ‘Chief Officer’ applies to at Burnley Council, in 
relation to the Localism Act 2011 are; Chief Executive, Chief Operating Officer (1 
post) and Head of Service (8 posts).  

 
16.  Remuneration is defined as the pay and rewards an individual receives. 
 
Chief Executive Remuneration 
 
17.  The appointment and employment terms relating to the Chief Executive were agreed 

at a meeting of Full Council on 6th September 2017.  An independent review of the 
role and the remuneration package was undertaken prior to the advertisement for this 
post.  This review involved obtaining external guidance and advice from North West 
Employers’ Organisation.   As a result of this review the salary for the post was 
unchanged. 

 
18.  The post of Chief Executive is paid on a single pay point of £107,112 (from April 

2017).  Additional allowances can be paid in relation to the role of Returning Officer 
and Electoral Registration fees (see para 17).  Fees were paid in the financial year 
2017/18. 

 
19.  Returning Officer and Electoral Registration Officer fees for various elections and 

referendums 

 

 

 

In accordance with the national agreement the Chief Executive is entitled to receive 
and retain the personal fees arising from performing the duties of Returning Officer, 
Acting Returning Officer, Deputy Returning Officer or Deputy Acting Return Officer 
and similar positions which he or she performs subject to the payment of pension 
contributions thereon, where appropriate.    

For local elections the fees and charges have been set in consultation with other 
authorities in Lancashire. 

Fees for Returning Officer and other electoral duties are identified and paid 
separately for local government elections, elections to the UK Parliament and EU 
Parliament and other electoral processes such as referenda.  As these relate to 
performance and delivery of specific elections duties as and when they arise, they 
are distinct from the process for the determination of pay for Chief Officers. 

The other terms and conditions of service relating to this post are in accordance with 
the Joint Negotiating Committee for Chief Executives of Local Authorities.   

Any other allowances relating to the post are the same as for all other posts within 
the Council, for example, reimbursement of fuel expenditure from business travel. 

February 2018 

5 

 
Chief Operating Officer Remuneration 
 
20.  There is one post of Chief Operating Officer : 

21.  The post of Chief Operating Officer is paid on a single pay point of £84,882 (from 
April 2017) at Band 1 of the Chief Officer grading structure, as determined by the 
Senior Manager Job Evaluation Scheme.   

 
22.  Additional allowances may arise from personal fees for performing the duties of 
Returning Officer, Acting Returning Officer, Deputy Returning Officer or Deputy 
Acting Return Officer and similar positions as detailed in paragraph 17 above.  The 
roles are currently appointed to by the Returning Officer prior to each election, or in 
the case of the Returning Officer, by full Council.   

 
22.  The other terms and conditions of service relating to these posts are in accordance 

with the National Joint Council – National Agreement on Pay and Conditions of 
Service.  Any other allowances relating to the posts are the same as for all other 
posts within the Council, for example, reimbursement of fuel expenditure from 
business travel. 

 
Head of Service Remuneration 
 
23.  The Council has increased its head of service posts from 7 to 7.6 FTE as part of its 

review of the management structure during 2017/18. Heads of service report to 
either the Chief Executive or the Chief Operating Officer.  These are shown on the 
chart at Appendix D. 

 

24.  The post of Head of Service is paid on a single pay point at either Band 2 or Band 3 

of the agreed pay structure as shown below.   The banding was determined by the 
Senior Manager Job Evaluation Scheme.  2018 salaries are pending a national pay 
award. 
 

 
Band 1 
Band 2 
Band 3 

April 2017 
£84,880 
£57,237 
£51,786 

April 2018 
£84,882 
£59,125 
£54,169 

 
25.  Additional Allowances for Head of Service posts are: 

 
Reimbursement of one professional subscription fee per annum - this applies to the 
Head of Legal and Democratic Services. 

Deputy Returning Officer - If these duties are undertaken by any Head of Service 
additional allowances are payable as described in paragraph 17 above.  The role is 
currently appointed to by the Returning Officer prior to each election.   

Strategic Head of Economic Growth – The Council has agreed an additional retention 
payment of £10,072 to ensure the post is paid at a comparable level to similar 2nd tier 
posts in the region. 

 

 
 

 
 

 
 

February 2018 

6 

 
26.  The other terms and conditions of service relating to these posts are in accordance 

with the National Joint Council – National Agreement on Pay and Conditions of 
Service. 

 

Any other allowances relating to the posts are the same as for all other posts within 
the Council, for example, reimbursement of fuel expenditure from business travel. 

 
Recruitment of Chief Executive and Chief Officers 
 
27.  Under Section 112 of the Local Government Act 1972, the Council has the “power to 
appoint officers on such reasonable terms and conditions as the authority thinks fit”.  
Where there is a requirement to recruit to the post of Chief Executive or a Chief 
Officer, the Council’s Constitution, Section 4.8 will apply.  Details are at Appendix E.  
 

Salary upon Appointment  
 
28.  Under normal circumstances, all new appointments to the post of Chief Executive will 

be made at a salary level reviewed and agreed by Full Council after external advice 
has been received.  Chief Officer appointments will be made at the agreed single pay 
point.  Any variance to these provisions will be subject to an analysis of the objective 
reasons for doing so and the approval of Council.  

 
Performance-Related Pay 
 
29.  The Localism Act 2011 requires Councils to provide details of any performance 

related pay for its Chief Officers however Burnley Borough Council does not have 
any such arrangements. 

 
Relationship between Chief Executive/Chief Officer Pay and other Employees 
 
30.  The relationship between the salaries of the Chief Executive and Chief Officers and 

the NJC median salary and the lowest paid salary are:- 

Post 

Benchmark Salary 

Ratio 

Chief Executive salary  median salary 
median salary 
Chief Officer salary 
lowest salary 
Chief Executive salary 
Chief Officer salary 
lowest salary 

3.9 
2.1 
6.6 
3.6 

 
From April 2017 
Chief Executive salary £107,112, Chief Officer salary £59,125– (Band 2 salary point) 
Median salary = £27,668 – scp 31 
Lowest salary on pay spine = £16,539 Foundation Living Wage from April 2017 (£15,972 2017/18) 
Lowest employee salary – Grade 3 £16,123 
 
Lowest Paid Employees 
 
31.  The Council complies with the National Joint Council – Pay and Conditions of 

Service.  An updated NJC Pay Policy from April 2016 created a revised grading 
structure, with Grade 3 reducing from 3 to 2 pay points and Grade 2, the Living 
Wage, being the minimum salary the Council now pays its employees, which at 1st 
April 2018 will be £16,539 per annum.  This does not include apprentice grades. 

 

February 2018 

7 

 
 

 

Progression through grades other than Grade 2 occurs through the payment of an 
additional annual increment on 1st April, each year.  Part-time posts are paid the 
same salary, but on a pro-rata basis.  Currently Grade 3 is the lowest grade paid to 
contracted employees.  There are 5 Grade 3 posts in the organisation. 

Termination Payments 
 
32.  The Council’s Redundancy Policy applies equally to all permanent employees 

regardless of their grade.  A redundancy payment will be paid to an employee when 
their post is made redundant and there are no suitable redeployment opportunities.  
The Redundancy Policy is at Appendix F.  
 

33.  For all permanent employees where there is the option for early retirement, the 

Council’s Statement of Pensions Policy will apply. Appendix G.  This Policy is only 
used on those occasions when there can be demonstrated savings to the Council in 
releasing an employee early.  

 

34.  The Government is proposing to introduce a cap on the total value of exit payments 

in the public sector of £95,000 enacted through the Enterprise Bill 2015-16.  
Regulations are still awaited and expected to be implemented during 2018.  Council 
policies and procedures will be updated accordingly. 
 

Employer Pension Contribution 
 
35.  The Council contributes to the Local Government Pension Scheme for its employees 
who are members of the Scheme which is 15.4 % of an employee’s salary.  This rate 
of contribution is set by actuaries advising the Lancashire Pension Fund and is 
reviewed on a triennial basis. 

February 2018 

8 

 
Employee Pension Contribution 
 
36.  Employees in the Local Government Pension Scheme currently pay the following 

annual contributions, based upon their salary (to be updated from April 2018). 

 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Employee 

Contribution 

Band 

Actual Pay 

1 

2 

3 

4 

5 

6 

7 

8 

9 

Up to £13,600 

£13,601-£21,200 

£21,201-£34,400 

34,401- 43,500 

£43,501-£60,700 

£60,701-£86,000 

£86,001-£101,200 

£101,201-£151,800 

More than £151,801 

% 

5.50 

5.80 

6.50 

6.80 

8.50 

9.90 

10.50 

11.40 

12.50 

Re-employment / Re-engagement of former Chief Officers 

37.  The Council currently has no policy that would prevent the re-employment or re-

engagement of a former Chief Officer who has received a redundancy payment and 
is subsequently engaged in a contract for service.  Any decision to re-engage a 
former Chief Officer must be approved by the Chief Executive. 

38.  The Government has issued draft regulations concerning the recovery of exit 

payments made to employees in the public sector and returning to a public sector 
role within a period of 12 months.  It is anticipated the regulations will be 
implemented during 2018 and Council policies and procedures will be updated 
accordingly. 

Gender Pay Gap 

39.  Burnley Council’s mean pay gap 2.3%, the median is 7.9% based on analysis at 31st 

March 2017.  These figures are lower than the national average.  Details are provided in 
Appendix H. 
 

Publication of the Policy 
 
40.  This Policy will be published on the Council’s website in March 2018, following its 

approval by the Council in February 2018. 

 
Review of Pay Policy 
 
41.  The Policy will be subject to annual review and must be approved by the Council 

prior to 31st March each year.  If there is a need to amend the Policy between 
reviews, then any such amendments will be considered by the Executive, prior to 
approval by the Council. 

February 2018 

9 

 

Burnley Borough Council NJC Pay and Grades 2017-18 (Living Wage) 
 

Grades 2017-2018 pending pay award 

Foundation Living Wage from 01/04/2018 

Appendix A 
 

 
Grade 14 

 
 
 
 
Grade 13 

 
 
 
 
Grade 12 

 
 
 
 
Grade 11 

 
 
 
 
Grade 10 

 
 
 
 
Grade 9 

 
 
 
 
Grade 8 

 
 
 
 

 

 
SCPA49 
SCPA48 
SCPA47 
SCPA46  
  
SCPB46 
SCPB45 
SCPB44 
SCPB43 

 
SCPC43 
SCPC42 
SCPC41 
SCPC40 

 
SCPD40 
SCPD39 
SCPD38 
SCPD37 

 
SCPE37 
SCPE36 
SCPE35 
SCPE34 

 
SCPF34 
SCPF33 
SCPF32 
SCPF31 

 
SCPG31 
SCPG30 
SCPG29 
SCPG28 

 

£43,821 
£42,899 
£41,967 
£41,025 

£41,025 
£40,057 
£39,177 
£38,237 

£38,237 
£37,306 
£36,379 
£35,444 

£35,444 
£34,538 
£33,437 
£32,486 

£32,486 
£31,601 
£30,785 
£30,153 

£30,153 
£29,323 
£28,485 
£27,668 

£27,668 
£26,822 
£25,951 
£24,964 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Hrly Rate 
23.18 
22.70 
22.20 
21.70 

21.70 
21.19 
20.73 
20.23 

20.23 
19.74 
19.25 
18.75 

18.75 
18.27 
17.69 
17.19 

17.19 
16.72 
16.29 
15.95 

15.95 
15.51 
15.07 
14.64 

14.64 
14.19 
13.73 
13.21 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 

 
Grade 7  SCPH28 
SCPH27 
SCPH26 
SCPH25 

 

 
 
 
 
Grade 6  SCPI25 
SCPI24 
SCPI23 
SCPI22 

 
 
 
 
Grade 5  SCPJ21 
SCPJ20 
SCPJ19 
SCPJ18 

 
 
 
 
Grade 4  SCPK17 
SCPK16 
SCPK15 
SCPK14 

 
 
 
 
Grade 3  SCPL13 
SCPL12 

 

 

 

 
 
 
 
Grade 2  SCPM11 
(FLW 18) 

 
 
 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

£24,964 
£24,174 
£23,398 
£22,658 

£22,658 
£21,962 
£21,268 
£20,661 

£20,138 
£19,430 
£18,746 
£18,070 

£17,772 
£17,419 
£17,072 
£16,781 

£16,491 
£16,123 

£16,539 

 

 

 

 

 

 
 
 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Hrly Rate 
13.21 
12.79 
12.38 
11.99 

11.99 
11.62 
11.25 
10.93 

10.65 
10.28 
9.92 
9.56 

9.40 
9.22 
9.03 
8.88 

8.72 
8.53 

8.75 

 

 

  

  

 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

February 2018 

10 

Appendix B 

 

 

CORPORATE PERSONNEL POLICY AND GUIDANCE 

PEOPLE AND DEVELOPMENT 

 

NJC Pay Policy 

For employees on National Joint Council (NJC) terms and conditions and/or whose jobs 

have been evaluated using the NJC Job Evaluation Scheme. 

 

 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 

 
 
 

February 2018 

11 

 

NJC PAY POLICY  

 

Introduction 
This policy should be read alongside the Council’s Pay Policy Statement, which is 
reviewed annually and the purpose of which is to: 

•  maintain a transparent approach to the setting of the pay of the Council’s 

employees; 

•  comply with the requirements of the Localism Act, Section 38 – Pay 

Accountability 

 
The statement details the methods by which salaries of all employees are determined; the 
details of the remuneration of its senior employees, i.e. Chief Officers and the relationship 
between the salary of its Chief Officers and other employees. 
 
Background 
The Council complies with the National Joint Council – Pay and Conditions of Service 
subject to changes agreed locally in consultation with recognised trade unions. 
 
The Pay Policy 2006, developed following a job evaluation exercise, created a 14 grade 
structure, each grade based on a job evaluation point range. 
 
In April 2013 the Council amended this to a 13 grade structure by merging grades 1 and 2 
and the associated job evaluation points in this pay band.  It also amended the number of 
pay points in grade 3 from 4 to 3 in order to become a Living Wage employer.  This 
involved a local agreement change to the value of scp10 of the nationally agreed pay 
spine.   
 
In April 2016 the Council agreed to further amend the pay spine reducing the pay points in 
Grade 3 from 3 to 2 (points12 and 13) and moving Grade 2 from scp10 to scp11 of the pay 
spine to reflect the increase in the Foundation Living Wage 
 
Spinal column point 11 will be a minimum of the Living Wage (as calculated by the Centre 
for Research in Social Policy at Loughborough University) or the agreed scp11 on the 
national pay spine, whichever is the greater.   
 
Whilst point 10 was removed from the Council’s grading structure from April 2016 lower 
points may still be used for traineeships or higher level apprenticeships if required. (This 
may be reviewed subject to the outcome of the 2018/19/20 pay negotiations and revised 
national pay levels). 
 
For employees of the Council progression through grades with more than one pay point 
occurs through the payment of an additional annual increment normally on 1st April, each 
year until the top of the grade is reached.  Part-time posts are paid the same salary, but on 
a pro-rata basis. 
 
The revised NJC Grading Structure and associated job evaluation point range is shown at 
Appendix 1 to this policy. 

February 2018 

12 

 
1.  Working Week 
 
The local agreement for normal working hours is as follows: 
 

•  The normal working week will be Monday to Friday. 
•  The normal working day will be within the hours of 7.30 am and 6.30 pm. 
 
Definitions: 

Working Saturday and/or Sunday is part of the normal working week. 

2. 
 
Weekends: 
 

Shifts: 

•  The total period covered by the shifts is 11 hours or more 
•  There are at least 4 hours between the starting time of the 

earliest and latest shifts 

•  The number of “normal office hour” shifts does not exceed 

one half of the total number of shifts in the rota. 

 
Irregular Hours  As part of the normal working week an employee’s hours of work during 

Monday to Friday fall outside the period 1 ½ hours before and/or 1 ½ 
hours after the Council’s normal office hours 

 
Evenings 
 
3. 

Enhancements 

Working beyond 8pm is part of the normal working week 

Employees who work shift, weekend, irregular hours or evenings will be paid a flat 
fee on top of their basic salary based on the following formula: 

 

Percentage of 
enhanced 
working hours 
Less than 1% 

Percentage of 
Total Annual 
Payment 
0% 

Annual Payment (£) 
Paid pro-rata to working 
hours 
0.00 

2 – 5% 

6 – 10% 

33.33% 

66.66 % 

Over 10% 

100.00% 

200.00 

400.00 

600.00 

Employees who work between 1am and 6am as a regular part of their job will be 
paid an additional 100% for the hours worked between 8pm and 6am.  Employees 
in this group do not qualify for payments in (a). 

Employees who work 3 weekends out of 4 and work beyond 7pm at weekends and 
work between 8pm -11pm as a regular part of their job will receive an additional 
10.5% on all hours worked.  Employees in this group do not qualify for payments in 
(a) 
As part of the local agreement on enhancements employees are provided with 1 
days’ additional leave at Christmas.  Employees will also contribute 1 day of annual 
leave, thereby facilitating full closure at Christmas.  In years where 3 days are 
required to facilitate a full closure, (2 in 7) the Council will provide this additional 
day.    

(a) 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
(b) 

 
(c) 

(d) 

 

February 2018 

13 

Overtime 

 
4. 
 
Overtime will be paid at the following rates: 
 

•  Mon – Sat 
•  Sunday 

33.3% 
50% 

Bank Holidays 

Standby and Callout 

 
Overtime rates only apply after 37 hours have been worked. 
 
All Time of in Lieu (TOIL) will be calculated at the same rate as overtime. 
 
5. 
 
Employees working on a Bank Holiday will be paid at 50%.  In addition to the payment 
time off with pay shall be allowed as follows: 
 
Time worked less than half the normal working hours on that day:   Half Day 
Time worked more than half the normal working hours on that day:  Full Day 
 
6. 
 
The Council’s Standby and Callout Policy applies to all employees who are called upon to 
attend work in respect of emergency arrangements.  Please refer to the policy for details. 
 
 
7. 
 
Pay is an important element in recruitment and retention, and if the Council is significantly 
and demonstrably below the market and unable to recruit or retain appropriate staff, then 
market supplements will be considered. 
 
Market supplements will be used in a manner that: 
 

Market Supplements 

•  Helps preserve the integrity of the grading system 
• 
• 

Is fair and transparent 
Is consistent with equal opportunities policy and Equal Pay considerations 

February 2018 

14 

 
Market supplements will normally be considered where there is difficulty recruiting staff 
following one/two advertisements within six months or a risk assessment indicates 
potential retention difficulties.  There would need to be investigation and analysis by the 
manager and People and Development to be sure that pay is the critical factor. There 
could be other reasons why people do not apply (e.g. hours of work, location, nature of the 
work, not advertising in the correct press).  Consideration may also need to be given to 
amending the person specification of the post. 
 
A market supplement will also be considered if retention problems are being encountered either 
for a job family or an individual key post.  Again, it is important to investigate the reasons for 
retention difficulties to establish that pay is the principal and primary reason.  There could be 
many other factors, such as staff not being able to make full use of their skills, working 
conditions, career development, management or training and development opportunities.  
 
The market with which a comparison is being made will need to be carefully established.  If 
comparison is being sought with the private sector, then the total recruitment package should be 
compared.  A private sector company may have a higher salary but other conditions may not be 
as attractive, e.g. hours of work, pension, access to training and development opportunities, etc. 
 
Where possible a reliable, reputable salary survey will be used as a comparator rather than 
specific jobs from other sources although these can be added to build up a comprehensive set of 
comparative data.  The National/Regional Employers Organisation will be used as a key source, 
supplemented by other means.  Where data is not readily available People and Development 
Unit will advise on the process for assembling comparative data. 
 
Care should be taken to compare like with like (i.e. just because a job has the same title, the job 
content, responsibilities and remit could be vastly different). 
 
Market Supplement Procedure 
 
Where a manager has severe recruitment or retention difficulties, s/he should discuss 
these with People and Development who will advise on a range of options to investigate 
and to solve the difficulties.  These could include — 
 
Recruitment 
 

•  advertise in different press  
•  advertise in different area  
•  change the advertisement  
• 
•  consideration of flexibility over hours of work  
•  part-time / job share  
•  a survey of the people who apply for a recruitment pack but who do not convert to 

redesign the job  

applicants  

•  a salary survey 

 
 

Retention 
 

•  making better use of staff skills  
•  career development  
•  up-to-date IT  

February 2018 

15 

 

•  distribution of work in the office  
• 
• 

flexible work arrangements  
learning from results of exit interviews 

 
If consideration of other factors is unlikely to resolve the problem and a survey of salaries shows 
that Burnley Council pay is below the appropriate market, then an application to pay a market 
supplement should be made to the Head of People and Development who will consult the 
Executive Member for Resources and Performance Management and the appropriate trade 
union Officers.  The Finance service unit should also be consulted to cost the proposal and the 
Head of Service must be able to identify the resources to meet the cost of the market 
supplement.   
 
The market supplement will not normally exceed 4 increments. 
 
The Head of Service must consult the trade union on the proposal prior to the formal application 
and may wish to work with service unit trade union representatives in assembling or researching 
data on comparative salaries. 
 
If the post is one of a number of posts having identical duties, the market supplement will be 
applied to staff currently in post. 
 
The market supplement will be superannuable and clearly distinguishable from basic pay.  It will 
be reviewed every 12 months.  If a further salary survey shows that there is no longer a pay 
differential, this will justify the removal of the supplement. 
 
If the market supplement is withdrawn, it will reduce on a phased cash basis (i.e. gross pay 
would reduce by £500 per annum over a period until the market supplement is withdrawn 
completely). 
 
If, after a successful job evaluation appeal, the grade of the post is increased the supplement 
may be adjusted to ensure that the market rate is not exceeded. 
 
 
Other linked Policies and Procedures 
Stand By and Call Out Payments Policy 
Pay Protection Policy 
Relocation Allowances Policy 
Long Service Awards 
Honoraria payments 
Job Evaluation Request for Review Procedure 
Subsistence Allowances 
Car mileage rates 
 
J:/Shared/Personnel Manual/NJC Pay Policy 
February 2018 

February 2018 

16 

Appendix C 

CORPORATE PERSONNEL POLICY AND GUIDANCE 

 

PEOPLE AND DEVELOPMENT 

 

Pay Policy 

 

JNC for Chief Officer of Local Authorities 

Constitution and Conditions of Service Salaries 

 

 
 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

February 2018 

17 

 

 
1. 

Introduction 

CHIEF OFFICER PAY POLICY 

 

The terms and conditions of employment of the Council’s Chief Officers are determined 
nationally by the Joint Negotiating Committee for Chief Officers of Local Authorities, as 
detailed in the Constitution Condition of Service Salaries.   
 
Pay levels do not directly depend on national negotiations.  They are locally determined 
and operated with the intention of sustaining and continuously improving high performance 
outcomes from the top of the organisation. 
 
2. 

Scope 

This policy applies specifically to the paid remuneration of those Council employees 
employed on Chief Officer terms and conditions.  Except where referred to in this policy or 
the Constitution Condition of Service Salaries, Chief Officers shall enjoy terms and 
conditions no less favourable than those afforded to National Joint Council (NJC) 
conditions. 
 
3. 

Aims 

The aims of this policy are to: 

•  promote fairness and equality; 
•  encourage cross organisational working; 
•  ensure pay levels are affordable and responsive to market pay rates; 
•  provide effective resourcing capacity for Chief Officer posts in order to deliver the 

Council’s priority outcomes. 

 
4. 

Determining Individual Salaries 

The relative job size of each post is determined through an agreed job evaluation scheme, 
supported by independent assessors. 
 
The Council agreed in 2011 to use the nationally agreed Local Government Employers 
JNC Job Evaluation Scheme which assesses jobs in the areas of knowledge, analysis and 
planning, impact and responsibility for resources.   
 
Job questionnaires are completed and authorised for each job role and are individually 
evaluated.  The resulting total points score will determine the salary level for each post as 
assessed against the Council’s agreed salary structure for Chief Officers. 
 
5. 

Appeals 

A Chief Officer who is not satisfied with their resulting job evaluation score should set out 
the grounds for his/her appeal under the relevant job evaluation factor. 
 
Step 1  
The employee will discuss their appeal with the Chief Executive (Chief Operating Officer)  
or the Chief Operating Officer (Heads of Service), supported by the Head of People and 
Development or the Strategic HR Consultant.  The employee is entitled to representation 
from a work colleague of trade union representative. 
 

February 2018 

18 

 
 
Step 2 
If the concerns are not settled or withdrawn the matter will be referred to an independent 
expert in the scheme for an independent view of the factor concerned. 
 
The decision of the external review will be final.  Chief Officers must wait a minimum of 12 
months before submitting a further request for review. 
 
6. 

Salary Structure 

When establishing or reviewing the salary structure for Chief Officers the Council will refer 
to the most relevant median salary in terms of local authority population and type.  The 
Council will seek independent external advice on the relevant pay data to be used. 
 
The median of the relevant benchmark pay data will normally be appropriate although pay 
levels may be assessed above or below the median taking account of external 
independent advice. 
 
The pay rates do not take account of market factors.  This is dealt with under the 
paragraph on Market Supplements. 
 
In determining the pay structure other factors which may be taken into account include: 

•  Chief Executive’s salary; 
•  special market / economic conditions; 
• 
• 

relationship of current salary levels to national median salaries; 
the management team structures compared to authorities of a similar structure and 
size; 
the size of each job as objectively assessed through a job evaluation scheme. 

• 

 
The salary structure (from April 2012) is made up of three bands with a single pay point in 
each band: 

•  Band 1 
•  Band 2 
•  Band 3 

JE Score 1501 and above  
JE Score 1101 – 1300 
JE Score 901 - 1100 

The salary in each pay band from April 2018 is as follows: 

•  Band 1 
•  Band 2 
•  Band 3 

Chief Operating Officer £84,882 (average minimum) 
Heads of Service £59,125 (based on median plus 7.5%) 
Heads of Service £54,169 (based on median plus 7.5%) 

Median pay levels will normally be monitored and independently reviewed every 3 years.  
The Council will be advised where the salary levels are significantly above or below the 
median for comparable local authorities as defined above. 
 
7. 

Hours of Work 

The normal week is 36.25 hours Monday to Friday.  The normal working day is within the 
hours of 7.30 am and 6.30 pm.  However the status of Chief Officer requires postholders to 
accept a high level of flexibility in the performance of the duties and responsibilities 
attached to the job role.  Therefore the salary agreed takes account of the fact that Chief 
Officers will be required to attend meetings and perform other duties relating to Council 
business outside normal office hours.  In circumstances where this is excessive some time 
off in lieu may be granted in consultation with the relevant line manager. 
February 2018 

19 

 
8. 

Honoraria 

The Council may consider granting an honorarium to a Chief Officer who performs duties 
outside the scope of his/her post over an extended period.  The amount will be assessed 
in line with the salary structure and job evaluation scheme and will be subject to objective 
justification. 
 
9. 

Pay Protection 

Pay protection will be limited to no more than one pay point above the existing Chief 
Officer salary level, subject to a maximum of £6,000 per annum on all pay bands.  The 
Chief Officer will accept additional duties and responsibilities beyond the scope of the 
lower graded job description up to the value of the protection and will continue to seek 
employment within the Council at a higher grade when this becomes available so the cost 
of protection is reduced.   
 
Protection will be on the following basis: 

  Year 1 – 100% cash protection* 
  Year 2 – 66% protection. 
  Year 3 – 33% protection 
  Year 4 and beyond – no protection. 

 
 
 
 
 
*Cash protection means that pay is frozen at the time of redeployment with no further 
annual pay rises being paid.  The percentages referred to are of the difference between 
the pay in the old and new job.  
 
10.  Market Supplements 

Pay is an important element in recruitment and retention, and if the Council is unable to 
recruit or retain a Chief Officer then a market supplement may be considered. 
 
Market supplements will be used in a manner that: 

•  helps preserve the integrity of the salary structure; 
• 
• 

is fair and transparent; 
is consistent with equal pay considerations. 

 
A market supplement or retention payment will normally be considered where there is difficulty 
recruiting a Chief Officer following one/two advertisements within six months or a risk 
assessment indicates potential retention difficulties.  There would need to be investigation and 
analysis by the Chief Executive/Chief Operating Officer and Head of People and Development 
supported by the Head of Finance and external, independent advice.   
 
Any additional payments would require the approval of the Council following receipt of 
appropriate advice, together with agreed mechanisms for the review and removal of the 
supplement. 
 
 
 
 
 
CO Pay Policy Feb 2018  HAB 
 

February 2018 

20 

 

 
 

 
 
At April 2018    
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Band 1 Chief Operating Officer 
Band 2 Heads of Service 
Band 3 Heads of Service  

 
 

1 
2 
6 

Appendix D 

 

February 2018 

21 

 

Officer Employment Procedure Rules  

 

1.  

Recruitment and appointment 

 
Appendix E 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

The Council will follow its approved recruitment and selection procedures, including 
the preparation of job descriptions, person specifications and advertisements, when 
seeking to make officer appointments. 

As part of the recruitment procedure the Council will make arrangements for a copy 
of the following declaration to be included in the recruitment information sent to all 
applicants: 

‘Under the Local Government Act 2000 you must declare in writing whether you are 
the parent, grandparent, partner, child, stepchild, adopted child, grandchild, brother, 
sister, uncle, aunt, nephew or niece of an existing Member or officer of Burnley 
Borough Council; or the partner of such persons. 

No candidate so related to a Member or officer will be appointed without the 
authority of the relevant chief officer or an officer nominated by him or her’. 

Applicants will also be advised that the Council will disqualify any applicant who 
seeks the support of any Member for any appointment with the Council. 

No Member will seek support for any person for any appointment with the Council. 

2. 

Recruitment of Chief Executive/ Head of Paid Service and other officers on 
JNC Terms and Conditions. 

 

 

Where the Council proposes to appoint the Chief Executive/Head of Paid Service or 
any other officer on Joint Negotiating Committee for Local Authority Chief 
Executives and for Chief Officers of Local Authorities (JNC Terms and Conditions) it 
will prepare a job description, person specification and advert.  Except where the 
position is to be advertised internally first the Council will make arrangements for 
the post to be advertised in such a way as to bring it to the attention of persons who 
are qualified to apply for it. 

A committee of the Council, constituted as an Appointments Committee as set out 
in Paragraphs 4, 5 & 6, will be established to recruit the relevant Officers. The Head 
of People and Development, or in their absence the Strategic HR Consultant, will be 
appointed as the Proper Officer for the appointment and will advise the 
Appointments Committees. 

Members of the Executive will have the opportunity to raise objections to decisions 
about the appointments of senior officers i.e. those on JNC Terms and conditions.   

3.  

Appointment of Chief Executive/ Head of Paid Service- by Full Council 

 

The Full Council will approve the appointment of the Chief Executive/ Head of Paid 
Service following the recommendation on the appointment by the Appointments 
Committee as set out in Paragraph 4. That committee must include at least one 
member of the Executive.

October 2017 

22 

 

4. 

5. 

 

 

Appointment of Chief Executive/ Head of Paid Service 
The Appointments Committee will comprise: 

Leader; 
Deputy Leader; 
Executive Member for Resources and Performance Management; and the Leaders 
of the two largest Opposition Groups.   
 

Appointment of officers on JNC Terms and Conditions (other than the Chief 
Executive or Heads of Service) – i.e. Chief Operating Officer. 

The Appointments Committee will comprise: 

Leader or Deputy Leader 
Relevant Executive Member 
Chair (Vice Chair as sub) of the Scrutiny Committee  
Chief Executive  
 
If, by the application of these Rules the membership of the Committee does not 
include at least one Member of an opposition group, then the Leader of largest 
opposition group (or their nominee) will be substituted for the Scrutiny place on the 
Committee. 
 

6. 

Appointment of officers on JNC Terms and Conditions (other than the Chief 
Executive/ Head of the Paid Service or Chief Operating Officer) – i.e. Heads of 
Service 

 

The Appointments Committee will comprise 

Leader or Deputy Leader, 
Relevant Executive Member; and  
Chief Operating Officer or Chief Executive 
 
Whichever of the Leader or Deputy are to be on the Appointments Committee, if 
they are also the Relevant Executive Member then another member of the 
Executive should be appointed to make up the three. 
 

7.  

Other appointments 

 

Appointment of assistants to political groups shall be made in accordance with the 
wishes of the political group. 

October 2017 

23 

 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 

PERSONNEL POLICY AND GUIDANCE 

PEOPLE AND DEVELOPMENT  

Appendix F 

 

REDUNDANCY 

POLICY 

Procedure and Guidance 

 
 
 
 

 

October 2017 

24 

INTRODUCTION 

SCOPE 

 

CONSULTATION 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

DEFINITION OF REDUNDANCY  

 

 

 

 

AVOIDING OR MINIMISING REDUNDANCY 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

PROCEDURE FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF REDUNDANCY 

CONTENTS 

 

1. 

2. 

3. 

4. 

5. 

6. 

7. 

8. 

9. 

 

2 

2 

2 

2 

2 

3 

4 

6 

6 

6 

7 

7 

8 

 

 

9 

10 

11 

14 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

REDUNDANCY SELECTION 

 

 

 

FORMAL NOTIFICATION OF REDUNDANCY  

SUITABLE ALTERNATIVE EMPLOYMENT 

10.  EMPLOYEE SUPPORT AND ADVICE   

11.  RIGHT OF APPEAL 

 

12.  REDUNDANCY PAYMENTS 

 

 

 

 

13.  WITHHOLDING REDUNDANCY PAYMENTS   

PAID LEAVE OF ABSENCE  

GARDEN LEAVE 

 

 

 

 

 

 

14. 
 
15. 
 

REDUNDANCY PROCEDURE QUICK GUIDE  

 

 

 

Redundancy Selection Model 
 

 

 

 

 

PROCEDURE FOR DEALING WITH REDUNDANCY APPEALS 

REDEPLOYMENT POLICY 

 

 

 

 

 

RETENTION AND REDEPLOYMENT DISABILITY, INJURY & ILL HEALTH
 
19 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

PAY PROTECTION POLICY 

 

 

 

 

 

 

24 

 

 

 

October 2017 

 

 

 

1 
 

 

INTRODUCTION 

SCOPE 

CONSULTATION 

improvements, 

reorganisations  and 

1. 
 
This  document  sets  out  the  principles  and  procedures  to  apply  where 
reductions in staffing levels, including compulsory redundancies, are required.  
 
Burnley  Borough  Council  aims  to  be  an  employer  of  choice  and  will  take  all 
reasonable  steps  to  avoid  redundancies.    However  it  recognises  that 
modernisation,  service 
financial 
constraints  or  the  need  for  particular  knowledge  and  skills  will  affect  staffing 
levels and therefore redundancies may become necessary. 
 
Where  this  occurs,  the  Council  is  committed  to  minimising  the  effect  and  to 
providing reasonable support to those employees affected. 
 
2. 
 
This procedure applies to all Council employees.  Where redundancy applies 
to  Chief  Officer  grades  then  either  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  or  the  Chief 
Executive  will  be  responsible  for  the  consultation.    Separate  consultation 
arrangements will apply for the Chief Executive. 
 
3. 
 
The Council believes in working positively with the recognised trade unions to 
resolve  problems  and  minimise  the  impact  on  employees.    Therefore 
consultations,  including  those  with  individual  employees,  will  be  timely  and 
meaningful,  and  all  positive  suggestions  given  serious  consideration.  
Consultation will take place as soon as practicable and notices will be issued 
only after meaningful consultation has taken place. 
 
4. 
 
Redundancy is defined in law as a dismissal for one of the following reasons:  
 
• 

the employer ceases, or intends to cease the business in which the 
employee was employed; or 

DEFINITION OF REDUNDANCY 

• 

• 

the employer ceases or intends to cease to carry on the business in the 
place where the employee was employed; or 

the requirement to carry out work of a particular kind has ceased or 
diminished or is expected to cease or diminish. 

 
In  cases  where  the  service  transfers  to  another  provider,  employees  are  not 
necessarily  redundant  and  would  normally  transfer  to  another  employer  on 
their  existing  terms  and  conditions,  commonly  referred  to  as  “TUPE” 
regulations (Transfer of Undertakings Protection of Employment). 
 
5. 
 
The Council will take all reasonable steps to avoid or minimise redundancies.  
The strategy adopted may vary for each redundancy situation, but typically 
could include: 

AVOIDING OR MINIMISING REDUNDANCY 

October 2017 

2 

 

• 

job matching an employee to another post in the authority (see Job 
Matching Procedure) 
redeployment and retraining (See Redeployment Policy) ; 

• 
•  achieving reductions through natural wastage; 
• 
reviewing the use of agency or temporary staff; 
freezing external advertising and filling posts from existing employees; 
• 
reviewing overtime working; 
• 
• 
reducing the hours of work: 
•  seeking voluntary reductions in working hours; 
•  seeking volunteers for early retirement / redundancy (ER/VR) where 

this can be justified in the financial or managerial interest of the 
Council. 

PROCEDURE FOR THE MANAGEMENT OF REDUNDANCY 

 
NB  Each request for ER/VR will be considered but it must be stressed that 
the overriding consideration will be the continued efficient running of the 
Council and the maintenance of a high quality skills base.  Therefore the 
Council reserves the right to reject requests from volunteers where it is 
believed that it is in the Council’s best interest. 
 
6. 
 
In any redundancy situation the procedure as set out below should be 
followed. 
 
6.1  Consultation 
 
Employees and relevant trade unions should be made aware of the proposals 
for organisational change, and the reasons, at the earliest opportunity.  Failure 
to consult could result in a finding of unfair dismissal by an Employment 
Tribunal.  Before starting any redundancy process advice should be sought 
from People and Development. 
 
Prior to employees and trade unions being formally advised of any proposals 
that may involve redundancies, Management Team must be consulted and 
authorise commencement of consultations.  Meaningful discussions should 
then take place with trade unions on measures that could be taken to avoid or 
minimise the redundancies and an agreement reached on the selection 
criteria that should be used.  A report to the Executive should be prepared to 
confirm the proposal and include detail of the consultation that has taken 
place prior to the issue of redundancy notices.   
 
The above reporting and consultation procedures include redundancies that 
occur as a result of known expiry of external funding arrangements that are 
agreed within existing budget arrangements.   
 
6.2 
 
There are minimum statutory timescales that indicate when formal 
consultation should begin.  Consultation should allow for further consideration 
of any counter-proposals and alternatives to redundancy. 
 
 

Timescales for Statutory Consultation 

October 2017 

3 

 

 

NO. OF REDUNDANCIES IN 
ANY 3 MONTH PERIOD 

Less than 20 possible 
redundancies 

20 – 99 possible redundancies 
 

100+ 

Period of Consultation 

Managers should allow a 30 day 
consultation prior to any redundancy 
notice being issued 
30 days statutory consultation period 
(including notification to the BIS) 
 
45 days statutory consultation period 
(including notification to BIS) 
 

 
6.3  Notification to the Department for Business Innovation and Skills (BIS) 
 
It is a legal requirement to notify BIS in writing of a proposal to make 20 or 
more employees redundant.  Notification must be made on form HR1, which 
can be obtained from the BIS website. www.bis.gov.uk  At least 45 days 
notice must be given if 100 or more employees are to be made redundant, 
and at least 30 days for 20 to 99 employees.  The Head of People & 
Development (or his/her representative) will normally undertake this 
notification. 
 
6.4  Notification to the Trade Unions 
 
The Head of People and Development will also formally notify the appropriate 
trade union(s) in line with s.188 of the Trade Union and Labour Relations 
(Consolidation) Act 1992 of the potential intended redundancies.  Formal 
consultation begins when a letter is sent to appropriate representatives, 
disclosing in writing: 

• 

• 

• 

• 

• 

the reason for the proposals; 

the numbers and descriptions of employees the Council proposes to 
dismiss as redundant; 

the total number of employees of that description employed at the 
establishment in question; 

the proposed method of selecting the employees who may be 
dismissed; 

the proposed method of carrying out the dismissals, including the 
period over which the dismissals are to take effect; 

• 

the proposed method of calculating the amount of redundancy pay. 

REDUNDANCY SELECTION 

 
7. 
 
Where the redundancy applies to particular jobs held by one or more 
individuals, the post(s) would be redundant without the need for selection. 
 
Where there are multiple redundancies or a reduction in posts within a group 
of employees the “pool” of employees from which the redundancies will be 
drawn must be identified.  This might be one team within a Service Unit, a 

October 2017 

4 

 

group of employees doing the same job, usually working to the same or 
similar job description, or those performing a particular function across a 
number of service units.  Managers should seek advice from People and 
Development if the selection pool is not clear. 

SELECTION CRITERIA 

The criteria used for redundancy selection must be clear and objective and be 
based on the future needs of the service.  It should be applied fairly and 
consistently and must not discriminate on the grounds of recognised 
protected characteristics as defined in the Equality Act 2010 which are: 

•  Age 

•  Disability 

•  Gender reassignment 

•  Marriage and civil partnership (in respect of eliminating unlawful 

discrimination)  

•  Pregnancy and maternity 

•  Race – this includes ethnic or national origins, colour or nationality 

•  Religion or belief – this includes lack of belief 

•  Sex (Gender)  

•  Sexual orientation 

In addition there will be no discrimination on the grounds of social background, 
political affiliation, spent convictions and trade union membership. 
 
The Council reserves the right to choose a method of selection which is 
appropriate to the particular redundancy situation and is committed to early 
consultation with the recognised trade unions and individual employees over 
the particular method of selection in any redundancy situation. 
 

EXAMPLES OF REDUNDANCY SELECTION CRITERIA 

•  selection based on merit, individuals being measured against a person 

specification that reflects the requirements for the skills, qualifications 
and experience in the new posts; 
interviews used to appoint to new posts can involve the use of tests 
that are relevant to the requirements of the new posts; 

• 

•  attendance record (having regard for our statutory obligations* and 

industrial injuries); 

•  disciplinary and capability records; 
• 

length of service in the redundant role or a substantially similar role, 
used alongside the criteria above. . 

*The Equality Act 2010 makes it unlawful for an employer to treat a disabled 
person less favourably because of a reason relating to their disability, without 
a justifiable reason.  Employers are required to make reasonable adjustments 
to working conditions or the workplace where that would help to accommodate 
a particular disabled person.  Employers should take account of this 
legislation when considering the dismissal of a disabled person. 

October 2017 

5 

 

FORMAL NOTIFICATION OF REDUNDANCY 

 
Period of Notice 
4 weeks 
 
1 week for each year of continuous 
employment (minimum of 4 weeks) 
Not less than 12 weeks 

Managers selecting for redundancy should usually use a scoring matrix, 
including all or some of the above criteria.  It is essential that all selection 
methods are objective and supported by documentation in case the decision 
is challenged.  Even though the criteria may satisfy the test of objectivity, the 
selection will still be unfair if they are carelessly or mistakenly applied.  
 
8. 
 
In accordance with this procedure, and following a period of consultation, 
notification of redundancy will be given, providing employees with appropriate 
notice of their employment being terminated: 
 
Continuous Service 
One month or more but less than 2 
years 
Two years or more but less than 12 
years 
12 years or more 
 
 
The Redeployment Policy is activated at the start of the consultation process 
and should be applied throughout the consultation process and during the 
period of notice.  This is particularly relevant to the search for suitable 
alternative employment and any subsequent trial period. 
 
9. 
 
Please refer to the Redeployment Policy.  Appendix 2  
 
10.  EMPLOYEE SUPPORT AND ADVICE 
 
10.1  Redundancy Counselling 
 
Once the individual(s) who are potentially redundant have been identified, an 
individual counselling meeting will be arranged led by the relevant Head of 
Service supported by a Personnel Officer.  The employee will be entitled to be 
accompanied by a trade union representative, friend or colleague. 
 
The Head of Service should confirm the following details: 
 

SUITABLE ALTERNATIVE EMPLOYMENT 

•  why the Council has decided that redundancies are necessary, the 

numbers and area of work involved and the selection criteria; 

• 

the personal details of the employee e.g. in relation to full name, 
address, start date of employment with Burnley Borough Council, 
continuous employment date, date of birth and details of any disability; 

•  any actions being taken to the reduce the impact of the potential 

redundancy including an explanation and copy of the Redeployment 
Policy, and any ongoing support with CVs, retraining, outplacement or 
personal support; 

October 2017 

6 

 

•  details of the employee’s entitlements in relation to notice period, 

redundancy payment and pension estimates (where applicable and as 
agreed under the Statement of Pensions Policy); 

• 

• 

the employee’s entitlement to reasonable time off to search for 
alternative employment; 

the employee’s right of appeal (Please refer to the procedure for 
dealing with Redundancy Appeals at Appendix 1) –  

 
The Council’s redundancy consultation process will be explained to the 
employee.  Notes of these discussions should be made and retained on the 
individual’s file. 
 
10.2  Time off for Job Search 
 
Employees will be allowed reasonable paid time off during working hours to 
look for work or to arrange/attend training.  To ensure this is consistently 
applied, it is recommended that: 

the relevant manager should agree time off in advance; 

• 
•  at least 24 hours’ notice should be given; 
•  a letter confirming the appointment or training should, as far as 

possible, support the request for time off. 

 
10.3  Welfare Counselling 
 
Welfare counselling for staff is available.  Employees should contact People 
and Development for further information. 
 
11.  RIGHT OF APPEAL 
 
Please refer to the Procedure for Dealing with Redundancy Appeals – 
Appendix 1. 
 
12.  REDUNDANCY PAYMENTS 
 
Redundancy Payments will be calculated according to the Employment Rights 
Act 1996, but improvements to these are permitted.  These improvements 
require that all continuous local government service will be aggregated and 
also provide local authorities with the discretion to lift the limitation on the 
amount of “a week’s pay” for redundancy payment calculation purposes from 
the normal statutory limit to the employee’s actual weekly wage/salary.  The 
Council has decided to use the discretion to base redundancy payments on 
the actual week’s pay, if higher than the statutory limit. (NB Actual salary will 
normally be basic salary plus any regular salary enhancements paid over the 
preceding 12 week period.  Actual salary will not include the employer pension 
contribution 
 
For employees who at the date of redundancy (with three or more months’ 
membership of the pension scheme) are entitled to early payment of pension 
and lump sum under the Local Government Pension Scheme Regulations 
2013.  Payments will be made in line with the agreed Statement of Pensions 
Policy. 

October 2017 

7 

 

13.  WITHHOLDING REDUNDANCY PAYMENTS 
 
If an employee, under notice of redundancy, receives an offer of work outside 
the local government service, they can either work their notice with the 
Council and receive their redundancy payment or, if they wish to start prior to 
the end of the notice period, resign from their post (counter notice).  In this 
case they will forgo the remainder of their notice pay but will be entitled to 
their redundancy pay calculated to the date they leave their employment. 
 
If an employee, under notice of redundancy, receives and accepts an offer of 
work within the local government service, as covered by the Redundancy 
Modification Order, before their employment with Burnley Borough Council 
ends they will not be entitled to a redundancy payment.  Their continuity of 
service will not be broken if they commence their new job before the 5th 
Monday following the date of termination of employment. 
 
If an employee is made redundant and after their termination date obtains 
employment with another local authority they are entitled to retain any monies 
paid to them by their former employer in respect of notice and redundancy 
payments but cannot commence their new job until 4 weeks after the 
termination date. 
 
If the Council is aware that an employee under threat of redundancy has 
received an offer of employment with another local authority prior to their 
finishing date, then no redundancy payments will be made. 
 
14.  PAID LEAVE OF ABSENCE 
 
It will normally be expected that employees will work through their redundancy 
notice period in order to continue to receive help and support from or arranged 
by People and Development.  In some circumstances, for example where 
work has ceased or significantly diminished, an employee may request to 
have paid leave of absence for some or all of their notice period.  Such 
requests will be considered by the Head of People & Development and must 
be supported by the relevant head of service.  Any agreement to such 
requests must usually be for the mutual benefit of the Council and the 
employee. 
 
15.  GARDEN LEAVE 
 
Garden Leave is the term used to describe a situation where an employee is 
required by their employer to remain away from work during the whole or part 
of the contractual notice period.  Under the terms of this redundancy policy, as 
agreed with the trade unions, the Council may require employees to remain 
away from work during the whole or part of their redundancy notice period. 
This action will be taken in circumstances where the Council considers it 
needs to manage a significant risk or protect its interests. Such decisions will 
be made by the Head of People and Development in consultation with the 
relevant head of service and trade union representative. 
 

October 2017 

8 

 

REDUNDANCY PROCEDURE QUICK GUIDE 
 
 

Head of Service identifies potential redundancy in their 

Service Unit and consults P and D for initial advice. 

 

 

 

 
 

 

Consults Management Team on issue/proposals and 

seeks authority to proceed and commence 

consultations.  Proposals clarified with P&D and initial 

consultation with appropriate TUs arranged. 

 

 

 

 
 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Initial discussions with 
TUs on proposal and 
impact.  Options 
considered re avoiding 
or minimising the 
effect including slotting 
in and job matching 
 
 

Potential redundancies 
confirmed.  Pool from which 
employees to be selected 
identified in consultation with 
the trade unions. 
 

 

 

Selection criteria 
agreed in consultation 
with TUs where 
applicable.   
 

 

 
 

 

 

Employees advised of proposal by Head of Service or 

designated substitute and individual meetings with 
employee(s) supported by the P&D team and TUs if 
required arranged.  Other training encouraged/made 

accessible. 

 

 

 
 

 

 

 

 

e
r
o

f

e
b

 

d
o
i
r
e
p
n
o

 

i
t

a

t
l

 

u
s
n
o
c
 
y
a
d
0
3
m
u
m
n
M

 

i

i

 

m
o
r
f
 
t

h
g
u
o
s
 

i

e
c
v
d
a

 

e
r
u
s
n
E

 
 
.

d
e
u
s
s
i
 
s
e
c
i
t

o
n

 
 

D
&
P

 
 
 
 
 

People and Development 
Manager notifies the DBIS if 
appropriate and formally 
notifies the trade unions by 
writing to the Regional Officer 
 
 

Individual consultations 
undertaken.  Employee 
informed of reason for 
redundancy, of their 
rights, the redeployment 
policy and the 
assistance available. 
 
Employee placed on at risk register. 
Vacancies to be advertised first to employees at risk 
Job matching/slotting into similar posts continues to be 
investigated and suitable alternative employment offered 
where appropriate 
 
 

Employee has not been 

 
 

 

offered alternative 

employment 

 
 
 
 
 
 

 

 
 

The selection criteria 
as agreed is applied 
 
Report to Executive 
confirming redundancy 
proposals 

 

 
 

 

 

 

Employee continues to be advised 
of vacancies up until termination 
date. 
 

 

Employee is unsuccessful at 
appeal. 

 

 
 
 

 
 

 
 
 

 

Employee issued with formal 
redundancy notice and advised of 
right of appeal. 
 
 

If employee is successful at appeal 
the selection criteria is reapplied. 
 

October 2017 

9 

 

NORMAL REDUNDANCY SELECTION MODEL 
Part 1 

Personal Details 

Scored out of 200 points overall 
Measured from (12 mths back from start of consultation) 

 
 
 
 
 

Full Name 
Directorate 
Service Unit 
Post No 
Job Title: 
Date of appointment to current job role 
Burnley Council service date 
Continuous service date 
Part 2 Knowledge Skills and 
Competence (60% 120 points) 

 
 
 

High 
standard 

Good 
standard 

Satisfactory 
all essentials  

 

 
 
 

Satisfactory 
most of 
essentials 
 

 
 
 

Nos. 

 
 
 
 
 

 

Score  

Total  
(Out of 200) 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

10 

Issued on  Part 4 Absence Record over last 2 

 

 
 
 

 

 

 
 
 

years (20% -  40 points) 

Heads of Service to confirm with P&D their 
proposed selection criteria before it is 
applied 
 
 
 
See separate guidance application of redundancy selection criteria 
Part 3 Disciplinary Record 
over last 2 years (10%  - 20 
points) 
Verbal Warning 
Written Warning 
Final Written Warning 
Period from: 
Period to: 
 
Part 5 Length of Service (10% - 20 
points) 
Length of service in current role or job roles 
very similar in nature with different title and 
grade 
 
Part 6 – Scoring 

 
 
 
 
 

No of working days lost 
No of individual periods of absence 
Absence factor score 
Period from: 
Period to: 

 

 

Records 
attached 
✓ 
 

Banding 
(if 
applicable) 
 

Example Job criteria 120 pts 
Met to a high standard all E & D criteria 
(120) 
Met to a good standard all E and D criteria 
(100) 
Met all E criteria to a satisfactory standard 
and some of D (80) 
Met most or all of E criteria to a satisfactory 
standard (60) 
Discipline 20 pts 
 0 (20), VW (15), WW (10), FWW (0) (over 
2 years) 
 
Absence factor score 40 pts 
0 (40), up to 25 (35), up to 63 (30), up to 
100 (20), up to 500 (15) up to 1000 (10) 
over 1000 (0) 
Calc over 2 years. ( Pro rata for PT staff) 
(NB Absences relating to industrial 
injury, pregnancy or disability sickness 
should normally be excluded)  
Length of Service 20 pts 
2 points for every year of service measured 
over 10 years 
over 10 years (20), over  9 years  (18), over 
8 years (16) etc…. over 1 year (2) up to 1 
year (0) 
 
Total Score (Out of 200) 

October 2017 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Appendix 1 

BURNLEY COUNCIL 

 

PROCEDURE FOR DEALING WITH REDUNDANCY APPEALS 

 
1.0  Redundancy Appeals Panel 
 
1.1  The Council shall establish a panel for the purpose of hearing and 

determining any appeals, which may be made against decisions relating 
to redundancies submitted by employees under this procedure.  The 
Appeals Panel shall consist of 3 members of the Executive.  Panels may 
be held in the evening if this helps to avoid delays and where possible an 
additional member identified as a substitute panel member. 

 
1.2  At the appeal the Head of People and Development/Strategic HR 
Consultant and/or the Head of Governance, Law, Regulation and 
Property/Senior Solicitor may be present throughout in an advisory 
capacity.   

 
1.3  Redundancy appeals involving the Chief Executive, 151 Officer and 

Monitoring Officer will be considered by the Council under separately 
arrangements covered by the Chief Executive terms and conditions as 
agreed locally. 

 
1.4  A member of the Appeals Panel shall not sit on any appeal that is to 

consider a decision on which he/she has had prior involvement.   

 

1.5  Prior involvement means having a direct involvement in the selection of 

the employees to be made redundant including the agreement of the 
selection criteria (in consultation with the trade unions), the application of 
that criteria and the resulting decision on which employee/s the 
redundancy will fall.  Prior involvement does not mean having an 
involvement in identifying savings targets and decisions on which 
services will be reduced or no longer supported.  It will also usually be 
the case that the Executive Member of the service area from where the 
appeal originates will not take part in the appeal process.  However, this 
will not be allowed to unreasonably delay an appeal being heard where 
other panel members are not available.   Similarly, any other Officer with 
prior involvement in the redundancy selection process shall have no role 
in advising the Appeals Panel. 

 
2.0  Appeals Procedure 
 
2.1  All employees have the right to appeal to the Council’s Redundancy 

Appeals Panel against dismissal for redundancy reasons.  The grounds 
for appeal will concern the application of procedures, consultation and 
the fairness of selection.  The decision of the Council to declare 
redundancies will not be grounds for appeal. 

 
2.2 

If the employee decides to appeal against their redundancy he/she must 
do so in writing, stating the grounds and enclosing relevant documents, 
within 10 working days of receiving formal confirmation that their post is 
to be made redundant.   This may be in advance of the issue of the 
formal redundancy notice where the proposed numbers of redundancies 

October 2017 

11 

 

within a defined period are high.  Notice of appeal must be sent to the 
Head of People and Development. 

 
2.3  The Appeals Panel shall hear the appeal not later than 20 working days 

after the receipt of the notice of appeal from the employee, unless a later 
date for the hearing is mutually agreed.  The employee shall be given at 
least five working days’ notice of the hearing, in writing, stating the date, 
time and location.   

 
2.4  The employee shall be in attendance at the hearing when the appeal is 
being heard and he/she may be represented by a friend or Trade Union 
representative, or legal adviser.  If any party fails to attend, the Appeals 
Panel may, dependent on the circumstances, dismiss the Appeal, 
consider it in their absence or defer the hearing to an alternative date.  
Where either party intends to produce documentary evidence or call 
witnesses at the Appeal, details should be given to the other party in 
advance of the hearing. 

 
2.5  The Appeals Panel shall have the right to allow the appeal or to confirm 

or alter the decision against which the appeal is made.  The procedure to 
be followed at the hearing shall be as follows: 

 
 

(Reference to the "Employee" should be taken to mean the employee 
and/or his/her representative(s) and reference to the Head of Service 
should be taken to mean the head of service or other appropriate senior 
officer). 

 
(a)  The Head of Service to put the case in the presence of the employee 

and may call witnesses; 

(b)  The employee to have the opportunity to ask questions of the Head of 

Service and/or the witnesses called, on the evidence given. 

(c)  The Appeals Panel to have the opportunity to ask questions of the Head 

of Service and witnesses. 

(d)  The Head of Service to have the opportunity to re-examine his/her 

witnesses.  

 

Note:  Where possible witnesses should be questioned in turn by 
the parties and the Panel and should withdraw on completion of the 
questioning unless specifically requested to remain. 

(e)  The employee to put his/her case in the presence of the Head of Service 

and to call such witnesses he/she wishes. 

(f)  The Head of Service to have the opportunity to ask questions of the 

employee and his/her witnesses. 

(g)  The Appeals Panel to have the opportunity to ask questions of the 

employee and his/her witnesses. 

(h)  The employee to have the opportunity to re-examine his/her 

witnesses (See also the note at (d) above). 

(i)  The Head of Service may sum up his/her case. 

(j)  The employee may sum up his/her case. 

October 2017 

12 

 

(k)  The Head of Service, the employee and all witnesses will withdraw whilst 

the Appeals Panel considers the case in private (the Panel’s adviser(s) 
will remain). 

(l)  The Panel may recall either party, with the other party in attendance, to 

clear points of uncertainty on information already given then both parties 
will withdraw. The Panel may at its discretion recall witnesses, further 
witnesses, or adjourn the hearing in order that further information may be 
produced by either party. 

(m)  When the Appeals Panel has reached a decision the parties will return 

and the Panel will announce the decision, which will be confirmed in 
writing within seven working days. 

(n) 

2.6 

In delivering its decision the Appeal Panel shall address each of the 
selection criteria used and advise whether they are satisfied that each 
has been applied fairly and consistently using all facts reasonably at the 
Head of Service’s disposal. 

In circumstances where the Appeals Panel upholds the employee’s 
appeal, for example on the grounds of the incorrect application of 
procedures, a lack of consultation or flaws or apparent unfairness in the 
application of selection criteria, the matter will be referred back to the 
service unit who will make arrangements for a Senior Officer, who has 
not been involved in the process so far, to undertake a review.  If the 
review results in no change to the employee affected then the original 
redundancy notice will continue to apply and there will be no further right 
of appeal.  If the review results in a different employee being selected for 
redundancy, agreement will be sought from the original employee to 
withdraw the redundancy notice with support as required from the trade 
unions.   

 
3.0  Further Rights of Appeal 
 
 

An employee who has completed two years’ of continuous service with 
the Council on the effective date of his/her termination of employment 
may complain of unfair dismissal to an Employment Tribunal and he/she 
should consult with his/her trade union or other adviser on that possibility 
at the earliest opportunity.  An application to an Employment Tribunal 
may be made as soon as the Council has given notice of dismissal and 
should be received by the Tribunal within a period of three months 
beginning with the effective date of termination.  

 
Redundancy Appeals/Executive/Oct 2004/VW 
Revised 19 September 2007 HAB 
Revised November 2009 and June 2010, September 2011, September 2014 
Further revised June 2016 
Further revised February 2017 

October 2017 

13 

Appendix 2 

 

 
1. 

Introduction 

Redeployment Policy 

Burnley Council is committed to making every endeavour to mitigate the effect 
of potential and confirmed redundancies by promoting the redeployment of 
affected employees to suitable available vacancies wherever possible.  We 
are also committed to the retention and redeployment of employees who can 
no longer carry out the duties of their job as a result of disability, injury or ill-
health. 

 

2.  Scope and Purpose of the Policy 

The Council has a statutory duty to consider the availability of alternative 
employment when an employee’s current job is at risk of redundancy.  The 
purpose of this policy is to provide the mechanism by which employees in a 
redundancy situation may be given every opportunity to obtain suitable 
alternative employment. 

The policy will apply to all employees of the Council unless the reason for not 
doing so can be objectively justified, for example the termination of short term 
fixed or temporary contracts 

The  Council’s  policy  on  Retention  and  Redeployment  on  the  grounds  of 
Disability, Injury or Ill-Health is detailed separately at Appendix 3.  Employees 
at  risk  due  to  redundancy  or  capability  will  be  given  equal  access  to 
redeployment  opportunities  but  disabled  employees  must  not  be  placed  at  a 
substantial disadvantage in comparison with non-disabled people. 
 
3.  Alternative Employment 
 
Employees at Risk (Refer to Redundancy Policy) 

Where a potential redundancy situation is anticipated Management Team will 
authorise the commencement of meaningful consultations in order to identify 
reasonable steps to avoid or minimise redundancies.  The Head of People 
and Development must be notified at this stage. 

Subject to confirmation, arrangements will then be made for the individual 
identified as “at risk” to be interviewed by the head of service and a personnel 
officer.  The employee may wish to have their trade union representative or 
work colleague present.  The necessity for the redundancy will be fully 
explained and discussed with the employee.  

It is essential that heads of service adopt a proactive approach to supporting 
employees at risk.  This will include encouragement to apply for any 
potentially suitable job, including temporary job roles and providing early 
access to refresher or additional training.   The employee may also be asked 
to complete a job application form to be used in any job matching exercise. 
Arrangements will be made by the Head of People and Development for the 
employee to attend job search skills training or otherwise receive advice and 
counselling as a means of assistance in obtaining alternative employment. 

 

October 2017 

14 

 

Heads of service must ensure that meetings are held on a regular basis, so 
that necessary support towards redeployment is made available.  A trade 
union representative or work colleague may accompany the employee at 
these meetings.  It is particularly important to ensure that these meetings take 
place with an employee at risk of redundancy so that the possibilities of 
redeployment can be fully explored before termination of employment takes 
place. 

People and Development will ensure that all vacancies are circulated to those 
employees identified for redeployment. 
 
The employee must be given serious consideration for any suitable vacancy 
arising before any other internal and external candidates are considered.  The 
test of suitability will be whether the employee could perform the duties of the 
vacant job given a reasonable amount of training or on the job instruction. 

The procedure for dealing with the recruitment and selection process is set 
out in the next section. 

4.  Recruitment And Selection Procedure 
 
Slotting in process (pre-advertising) 

Consideration may be given to “slotting in” an employee directly into a vacant 
post if the following conditions apply.  This approach can be applied prior to 
and after the issue of redundancy notices 

a)  The vacant job is on the same grade or a maximum of one grade lower, 

when pay protection would be applied. 

b)  The work is broadly similar to that in the employee’s current job role.   

(N B:  

reference should be made to the job description and person 

specification for the old and new job to assess whether this would be 
similar). 

c)  There is only one employee suitable for each vacant post and no 

competitive selection is necessary. 

d)  The ‘at risk’ employee meets the essential requirements of the person 

specification for the vacant job, or if there is a small training gap, this 
could be met within a short period, e.g. the acquisition of basic keyboard 
skills or technical updating by a short course. 

e)  There is agreement between the employee, the head of service, the 

trade union and the Head of People and Development. 

f)  Where agreement is not possible, the post will be advertised in line with 

the procedure detailed below. 

g)  The application of the policy results in a logical reasonable outcome. 
 

Job Matching (pre- advertising) 

Job matching is a process of identifying job roles in the organisation that have 
similar skill requirements which employees who are at risk, could reasonably 
undertake with additional training.  This approach can be applied prior to and 
after the issue of redundancy notices. 

October 2017 

15 

 

• 

• 

• 

• 

• 

A completed application form will be forwarded to the People & 
Development who will try to match the employee against any existing 
vacancies.  Even if the employee does not meet all the essential 
requirements, then an interview may still take place if is considered the 
requirements can be met within twelve months.  

The matching process will only consider vacancies at the same grade or 
no more than one grade higher or lower than the grade of the 
employee’s job.  

The service unit and a representative from People and Development will 
interview the employee/s.  The suitability of the employee will be 
assessed in the normal way and, if necessary, a training plan will be 
prepared to ensure that any training gap is filled as soon as possible. 

If successful the employee will be offered the position under a variation 
to their contract or as suitable alternative employment. 

The Council’s normal policy on pay protection will apply. 

 
Advertising of Vacancies 

When a redundancy situation has been declared, or is anticipated, the policy 
on advertising vacancies internally and externally concurrently will be 
suspended and the following process of advertising will be followed: 

 

Stage 1 

Employees at Risk  

Vacancies are to be advertised first to employees who have received notice of 
redundancy or who have been identified as the subject of consultation with the 
trade  union  and  to  employees  seeking  redeployment  under  the  policy  for 
Retention and Redeployment Policy on the grounds of Disability, Injury or Ill-
Health. 

This is to allow them the first opportunity to apply for the vacancy and is 
termed as “ring fencing”. 

This will only apply providing that the post advertised is of the same grade, or 
no more than one grade above the grade of the employee (s) at risk.  If this 
condition is not satisfied, then the process moves to stage 2.  Ring-fencing of 
vacancies does not apply to temporary or fixed term employees who will not 
have completed at least twelve months service at the date of redundancy. 

NB  Where employees apply for posts more than one grade below their 

existing job role, pay protection will be limited to no more than 4 
incremental points above the maximum of the lower graded job 

 

Stage 2 

Internal Advert 

If there are no suitable applicants from the employees at risk or if the post is 
more than one grade higher than those of the employees at risk, consideration 
will be given to advertising the post internally if this is likely to release a 
vacancy lower down the grading structure which could then be slotted/job 
matched or advertised internally to those at risk   The decision will be made 
based on the job description and person specification and be confirmed by 

October 2017 

16 

 

Management Team.  Comments from the trade unions will be taken into 
consideration.  In any event if the vacant post is graded 11 or above, the 
vacancy will normally move to stage 3 and be advertised internally and 
externally concurrently. 

Stage 3  

External Advert 

Where it is not or has not been possible to fill the vacancy internally due to 
criteria or decisions as detailed at stage 2, or requirement for specialist 
qualification/experience, the job will be advertised internally and externally 
concurrently.   

Shortlisting  

The Council’s recruitment and selection procedure for shortlisting should be 
followed.  An employee at risk should be shortlisted where he/she meets the 
essential criteria as detailed in the person specification of the advertised post.  
If there is any doubt advice must be sought from People and Development. 

Interviewing 

Interviews must be held in accordance with the Council’s recruitment and 
selection procedures and interviewers must be clear about the person 
specification for the job and the extent to which the employee either meets or 
does not meet it. 

Comprehensive records of interviews must be kept so that decisions made 
can be justified if necessary.  Each interviewer should complete an interview 
record sheet and a consensus decision should also be recorded. 

In a redeployment situation People and Development should always be 
consulted and a personnel officer will normally be included in the panel for any 
interviews which take place. 

5.  Offer of Alternative Employment 

An offer of alternative employment must be made in writing before 
employment under the previous contract ends.  Employment in the new job 
must start immediately the notice expires or after an interval of not more than 
four weeks.  Advice on the wording of the offer letter must be sought from 
People and Development. 

If appropriate, the employee may be seconded to the new job before a period 
of notice in the old job has expired in order to gain more experience of the 
new situation.  This will not, however, form the part of the trial period. 

6.  Trial Period 

An employee who is under notice of redundancy has a statutory right to a trial 
period of four weeks in an alternative job where the provisions of the new 
contract differ from the original contract.  The trial period will commence on 
appointment to the new job, normally immediately after the previous contract 
has ended.  The purpose of the trial period is to give the employee the chance 
to decide whether the new job is suitable without necessarily losing the right to 
redundancy payment.  The Council will also use the trial period to assess the 
employee’s suitability. 

October 2017 

17 

 

A trial period longer than four weeks can be agreed for retraining purposes.  
This agreement should be in writing, specifying the date on which the trial 
period ends and setting out the employee’s terms and conditions after it ends.  
If the employee works beyond the end of the four week trial period, or the 
jointly agreed extended trial period, any redundancy entitlement will be lost 
because the employee will be deemed to have accepted the new 
employment. 

If the new employment proves to be unsatisfactory during the trial period and 
is terminated, then the original redundancy will take effect.  If the trial period is 
satisfactorily completed, the original dismissal on the grounds of redundancy 
is held not to have taken place and continuity of employment is unbroken. 

Trial periods can obviously be a stressful time for employees who will need 
understanding and encouragement.  The progress of the employee 
throughout the trial period should be closely monitored by way of mutual 
reviews with the head of service or designated substitute at weekly intervals, 
with support and counselling offered where appropriate.  A decision to 
terminate employment at the end of the trial period for unsuitability should be 
taken only after careful, detailed consideration and discussion with People 
and Development. 

7.  Remuneration And Conditions Of Employment 

The Council currently operates a policy, which protects an individual’s pay 
where he/she is redeployed to a lower graded post, as a result of redundancy.   

Where an employee is redeployed to a lower graded post and protection is 
applied, he/she can be expected to carry out duties commensurate with the 
level of protection as and when required. 

In view of the protection he/she would also be expected to apply for suitable 
vacancies more appropriate to the protected salary as and when they become 
vacant. 

The current agreement on pay protection is set out in Appendix 4 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Redeployment Policy November 2009 

Updated September 2014 and February 2017 

 

October 2017 

18 

Appendix 3 

 
 

Retention and Redeployment Policy 

Disability, Injury or Ill-Health 

 
1.  Scope  
 
This policy provides guidelines on the retention and redeployment of employees who can 
no longer carry out the duties of their job as a result of disability, injury or ill-health. 
 
The Council intends, wherever possible, to retain such employees in their own post, to 
offer them comparable employment or to redeploy them into a more suitable post of equal 
status.  This post will be no more than one grade above the employee’s current post. 
 
2.  Legal Requirement 
 
The Equalities Act 2010, places an obligation on the Council to take reasonable steps to 
ensure that disabled people are not placed at a substantial disadvantage in comparison 
with non-disabled people.  Examples of the types of reasonable adjustments employers 
are expected to consider are detailed below. 
 
3.  Retention of Employees in their Current Post 
 
We will make every effort to retain an employee in his/her current post or where this is not 
possible, to redeploy him/her into an appropriate post of equal status, preferably within the 
same service unit. 
 
In the event of an employee becoming unable to perform all or part of the duties of his/her 
current post, retirement on the grounds of ill-health will only be considered as a last resort 
and will be subject to the agreement of the Council’s Occupational Health Consultant. 
 
Where it becomes apparent that an employee is no longer able to fulfil all or part of the 
duties of their current post, for reasons of disability, ill-health or injury, their manager 
should meet with them to discuss the situation.  It is essential that the issue be handled 
sensitively and confidentially.  Consultation should take place, at every stage, with the 
employee concerned together with a chosen representative (e.g. trade union 
representative, or work colleague). In appropriate circumstances a close family member 
may be permitted to attend to support the employee. 
 
In accordance with the Equality Act, managers should consider making the following 
reasonable adjustments to enable the employee to continue in employment.  However, this 
is not an exhaustive list and other alternatives should also be considered where 
appropriate. 
 
For guidance on managing the attendance of employees with disabilities, please refer to 
the Managing Attendance Policy and Guidelines and the Tailored Adjustment Agreement 
in the personnel manual. 
Reasonable Adjustments: 

•  making adjustments to premises i.e. where cost is not an unreasonable factor; 
•  allocating some of the disabled employee’s duties to another person*; 
•  agreeing a change to the employee’s working hours; 

  19 

 
•  assigning the employee to a different place of work; 
•  allowing the employee to be absent during working hours for rehabilitation, assessment 

or treatment (see Disability Leave below); 

•  additional training; 
•  acquiring or modifying equipment; 
•  modifying instructions or reference manuals; 
•  modifying procedures for testing or assessment;. 
•  providing a reader or interpreter; 
•  providing additional supervision; 
• 

transferring the employee to fill an existing vacancy (see Redeployment Section 
below). 

 
*In cases where other employees will be affected, e.g. if duties are to be reallocated, it is 
important to consult all affected employees and their representatives. 
 
The Council has a number of schemes, including V-time, flexitime, job share, part-time 
working and homeworking, which should be considered in assisting an employee to 
continue in employment. 
 
In some cases it may be appropriate to involve advisers from the Department of Work and 
Pensions (DWP) in undertaking assessments to determine appropriate, reasonable 
adjustments in addition to Occupational Health.   The advisers can often assist in funding 
adjustments under the Access to Work Scheme.  
https://www.gov.uk/government/publications/access-to-work-guide-for-employers 
 
People and Development (P&D) is available for advice and support on all issues related to 
retention and redeployment. 
 

4.  Redeployment 
 
Recruitment and selection will be managed as detailed in the Redeployment Policy.  
Employees will be considered for redeployment alongside those who are at risk of 
redundancy taking into account any reasonable adjustments that may be required. 

At all stages in the redeployment procedure the employee concerned, together with his/her 
representative must be consulted.  Discussions of this nature must be handled in a 
sensitive and confidential manner. 
 
Once all parties are agreed that a return to the employee’s current post is not appropriate 
then, wherever possible, the employing service unit is responsible for finding a suitable 
alternative post within their own unit. 
Redeployees should be considered for all appropriate vacancies arising within the unit 
before they are generally advertised using the slotting in or job matching process.  They 
should not necessarily be expected to meet all the essential criteria on the person 
specification.  The recruiting panel should instead consider whether or not the individual 
has the potential to undertake the duties of the post with the necessary training and 
support and within an agreed timescale.  If necessary, reasonable adjustments to the 
duties and associated essential criteria should also be considered at the interview stage in 
order to comply with the Equality Act. 
 

  20 

 
If it is not possible to redeploy an employee within the employing service unit the head of 
service should contact P & D for assistance in redeploying the employee into another 
service unit.  P & D must be satisfied that the employing service unit cannot find anything 
suitable. 
 
In accordance with the provisions of the Equality Act a reasonable adjustment to consider 
would involve transferring an employee to a more suitable post under the slotting/job 
matching process including any necessary reasonable adjustments.  Advice should be 
sought at this stage, to arrange for a referral to Occupational Health and to seek guidance 
from a disability adviser from the Department of Work and Pensions.  
 
Redeployees will be considered first for suitable, alternative posts before they are 
generally advertised, alongside employees at risk of redundancy, using the agreed 
procedures in under Section 4 of the Redeployment Policy.  They should not necessarily 
be expected to fulfil all the requirements of the person specification immediately.  
Reasonable adjustments to the duties and associated essential criteria will also be 
considered where necessary.   
If an employee is redeployed to a post at a lower grade the Pay Protection Policy will be 
applied.   

Once it is has been agreed that redeployment is the best option for the employee, People 
and Development will continue to try and find a suitable vacancy for a period of up to 12 
weeks after the employee has been declared fit to return to work.  This period may be 
extended dependent on the circumstances and in agreement with the Chief Operating 
Officer. 
 
5.  Redeployment Opportunity Not Identified 
 
If a suitable vacancy does not arise within the agreed period the employee will be referred 
to the Occupational Health Unit to be considered for retirement on the grounds of ill health.  
 
If the Occupational Health Consultant is unable to certify entitlement to early release of 
superannuation benefits on the grounds of ill-health, or if a suitable job offer is 
unreasonably refused, or if no suitable, alternative employment is available, it will be 
necessary to review the continued employment on the grounds of capability.  This will be 
dealt with in accordance with the Capability Section of the Council’s Disciplinary Procedure 
(see Managing Attendance Policy). 
6.  Register of Reasonable Adjustments 
 
All reasonable adjustments that relate to an employee must be reported to People and 
Development to be recorded on the employee’s personal record.  This will assist the 
Council to demonstrate, if challenged, the extent to which it has made reasonable 
adjustments.  It will also help to monitor the cost of making such adjustments. 

 

The employee and manager will complete a Tailored Adjustment Agreement that will 
provide a living record of reasonable adjustments agreed between the disabled employee 
and his/her line manager. 

 

 

  21 

 
7.  Monitoring 
 
Statistics relating to reasonable adjustments will be incorporated into People and 
Development’s reporting and information processes. 
 
8.  Complaints 
 
If an employee feels that he/she has been unfairly treated at any stage of this procedure, 
the Council’s Grievance Procedure may be invoked. 
 
9.  Disability Leave Scheme (DLS) 
 
The Disability Leave Scheme provides newly disabled employees or a disabled employee 
whose condition has significantly deteriorated with a period of time off work to adjust to the 
change in personal and professional circumstances.  During the leave the employee is 
able to assess their disability or condition and how it affects their job role, bridging the gap 
between sickness and a return to work.   It will cover the period between the end of sick 
leave, when the employee is judged as fit to return to work, and the employee’s actual 
return.   
 
The DLS provisions cover all existing employees, full-time and part time.  There is no 
qualifying period although each case will be considered on its own merits. 
 
The DLS is not intended to burden services but is about ensuring good practice in the 
workplace, creating an environment where employees are willing to discuss their disability 
and where disabled employees and their managers can proactively assess how the 
employee can remain in work.   
Its purpose is to enable the employee to participate in an assessment of the changes 
required in their job or work environment, and/or to become familiar with new techniques 
and processes.  It can also allow time for: 

•  providing time to adjust to the change in personal and professional circumstances,  

• 

reassessing current job role, adjustments or alternative opportunities; 

•  adaptations to the work environment; 

•  equipment to be put in place and/or assessment of how it can be funded; 

•  undertaking a programme of rehabilitation and training on the job or residential 

centre; 

•  discussions with specialist Disability Employment Advisers or Occupational Health 

to plan the way forward; 

•  assessing/clarifying if the employee will be able to return to his/her previous 

employment or be redeployed to another post or if an application for ill health 
retirement should be pursued. 

The Managing Attendance Policy already allows for a period of up to 4 weeks therapeutic 
return.  In addition employees may also have an accumulated balance of annual leave, 
some of which could be used to extend the therapeutic process.  The DLS can be applied 
where significant changes/additional assessments are required for reasons as detailed 
above. In practice some of the above assessments may also take place whilst the 
employee is still on sick leave.   
 
 

  22 

 
If, following a careful process of formal and informal consultation and the DLS is 
considered appropriate, the Chief Operating Officer, Head of Service and Head of People 
and Development can allow up to 4 weeks additional leave to assist in the adjustment 
process.  The leave will be paid at the usual salary and noted on the employee’s personal 
and leave records. 
 
During the leave, arrangements should be made for an employment assessment to be 
carried out by a competent organisation before any decision is made about the employee’s 
future e.g. Disability Employment Adviser and Occupational Health Consultant in 
consultation with People and Development.  This assessment is intended to 
clarify/quantify/put in place the rehabilitation required, the time this will take, the 
equipment/adaptations required and how this can be funded. 
 
It is important that assessments and resulting action plans, necessary training and medical 
advice are closely monitored and co-ordinated to make best use of the additional leave.  
This will be the responsibility of People and Development.   
 
People and Development will make a record of: 

the employee details and the nature of their disability; 
the assessments undertaken; 
the detail and cost of equipment required and provided; 
the detail and cost of any rehabilitation/training; 

• 
• 
• 
• 
•  period of DL; 
•  cost of any temporary cover; 
•  other quantifiable costs; 
•  quantifiable savings – e.g. decreased retirement costs, savings on recruitment or 

induction training of new staff. 

 
Retention and Redeployment Policy February 2017 
Last reviewed May 2014/HAB 
 

  23 

 

Appendix 4 

BURNLEY COUNCIL 

 

Pay Protection Policy 

 
The Council’s policy on pay protection, applicable to employees on National Joint Council 
(NJC) terms and conditions is as follows: 
 
1.  Protection will be limited to no more than 4 incremental points above the maximum of 

the lower graded job. 

2.  The employee will accept additional duties and responsibilities beyond the scope of 

the lower graded job description up to the value of the protection. 

3.  The employee will continue to seek employment within the Council at a higher grade 
when this becomes available so the cost of protection is reduced.  The original limits 
on protection will still be applicable. 

4.  When assessing protection limits for an employee in receipt additional payments, the 

figure for comparison will include other payments and will be made to the nearest 
equivalent spinal column point. 

5.  Protection will be on the following basis  

 
 
 
 
 
 

  Year 1 – 100% cash protection* 
  Year 2 – 66% protection. 
  Year 3 – 33% protection 
  Year 4 and beyond – no protection. 
 
*Cash protection means that pay is frozen at the time of redeployment with no further 
increments or annual pay rises being paid.  The percentages referred to are of the 
difference between the pay in the old and new job.  

 
6.  Conditions of Protection 
 
 
a)  Protection will apply to contractual overtime and the following locally agreed 

Subject to the overall protection limit detailed in para 1 above  

additional pay enhancements encompassing   

•  Shift allowance 
•  Irregular hours payment 
•  Weekend enhancements 

 
 

[To qualify for this protection the employee must have been in receipt of the additional 
payment for 12 months or more.  This protection would only apply in redeployment 
situations.] 

 
b)  Protection will not be applied to standby/call out payments or irregular overtime. 

 
 

Personnel Committee 19.1.99/Amended 2004/JB 
Last reviewed (no changes) October 2017 
Next review November 2020 

  24 

 

Appendix G 

 

Burnley Borough Council 

 

Statement of Pensions Policy 

 
Introduction 
 
1. 

This Statement outlines the Council's Policy with regard to the payment of pension 
benefits.  The statement has been formulated following full consultation with the 
Trade Unions and reflects the Local Government Pension Scheme Regulations 
2013 as amended and the discretions adopted by the Council. 

 
Retirement 
 
2. 

The Local Government Pension Scheme’s normal pension age (NPA) is equal to 
the employee’s individual State Pension Age (SPA).  Employees can retire and 
receive their benefits without any reductions at this date.  Further information on the 
SPA can be found at www.gov.uk/calculate-state-pension 

 
3. 

 
4. 

 
5. 

Employees are able to retire at anytime from age 55 onwards without the Council’s 
consent but their benefits may, dependent on age and service, be reduced to reflect 
the early payment.  Further information on the reductions can be obtained from 
www.yourpensionservice.org.uk.   

Employees are able to join and remain in the scheme up until 2 days before their 
75th birthday.  Benefits for employees who defer drawing benefits beyond their NPA 
will be actuarially increased to reflect the fact that they will be paid for less time. 

With effect from 1st April 2014 pension benefits are calculated on a Career Average 
Re-valued Earnings (CARE) Scheme formula.  A CARE pension works by taking a 
1/49th of an employee’s annual pensionable salary and then adds this into a 
pension pot.  This pension pot then increases each year in line with CPI.  Further 
information on the calculation of pension benefits pre and post 2014 can be found 
at www.lgps2014.org  

 
Early Retirement with Redundancy (compulsory or voluntary) 
 
6. 

Redundancy Payments will be calculated according to the Employment Rights Act 
1996, but improvements to these are permitted.  These improvements require that 
all continuous Local Government Service will be aggregated and also provide Local 
Authorities with the discretion to lift the limitation on the amount of “a week’s pay” 
for redundancy payment calculation purposes from the normal statutory limit (£479 
per week as at 6 April 2016) to the employee’s actual weekly wage/salary.  The 
Council has decided to use the discretion to base redundancy payments on the 
actual week’s pay, if higher than the statutory limit. 

 
7. 
 
8. 

Only completed years count for the purpose of calculating a redundancy payment. 

Employees who are aged 55 or over at the date of redundancy (with two or more 
years membership of the Pension Scheme) are entitled to early payment of pension 
and lump sum under the Local Government Pension Scheme Regulations 2013. 

  25 

 

Note:  Voluntary Early Retirement with Redundancy can only be granted if 

there is a substantial saving to the Council in allowing the employee to 
leave.  The saving from an early retirement must be sufficient to pay 
back the full capitalised cost over no longer that a 5 year period.  The 
saving will usually involve the net loss of a post but the retirement 
must satisfy the statutory definition of redundancy. 

 
Retirement in the Interests of Efficiency of the Service 
 
9. 

The Council is able to retire an employee who is over 55 in the interests of 
efficiency of the service.  The following factors will be used upon which to judge the 
merits of each case: 

a) 

b) 

c) 

 

 

 

 

The benefits in increased efficiency, for example, in service delivery or to 
facilitate changes to the organisation. 

Any savings that will accrue. 

Health grounds, where retirement on medical grounds or dismissal on 
capability grounds are not appropriate. 

d) 

Compassionate grounds. 

 
Ill-Health Retirement 
 
10. 

The 2007 Regulations introduced a 3-tier system of ill-health retirement which will 
be applied dependant on the assessment of the Occupational Health practitioner as 
to the prospect of the employee obtaining gainful employment before their normal 
pension age (NPA) as follows: 

 

 

 
11. 

 

 

Tier 1 

Tier 2 

Tier 3 

No reasonable prospect of the employee obtaining gainful  
employment due to ill-health before NPA 
Cannot obtain gainful employment within reasonable* period of 
leaving due to ill-health but likely to be able to do so before NPA 
Can obtain gainful employment within reasonable* period of 
leaving 

* Defined as 3 years 

Ill health retirement benefits will be paid in conjunction with the Pension Regulations 
as follows: 

Membership 
< 2 years 
2 years and over 

Immediate 100% enhanced 
Immediate 25% enhanced 
Immediate no enhancement 

 
Refund or transfer out 
Tier 1   
Tier 2   
Tier 3   
 
* The enhancements will be based on the 
period to the employees SPA (or age 65 if later) 
 

  26 

 
12.  Where a former employee is certified as Tier 3 they are required to inform the 

Council of any employment taken up, whether local government or not.  Where 
gainful employment has not been found by 18 months following termination, the 
Council will refer the former employee to the Council’s Medical Advisor for an 
opinion as to whether the former employee is capable of undertaking any gainful 
employment.  Depending on their assessment the pension could either be 
suspended until their SPA or may be upgraded to tier 2. 

 
13. 

 
14. 

The Council will not terminate employment on ill-health grounds without the 
recommendation of the Council's Medical Advisor.  Further details can be obtained 
from the Council's Managing Attendance at Work Policy. 

The formula for the calculation of benefits in ill-health retirement situations is the 
same as for retirement. 

 
Auto Enrolment 
 
15.  Burnley Borough Council implemented the Government’s Auto-Enrolment 

scheme from 1 June 2013.  This means that all employees who meet the following 
criteria will be automatically enrolled into the Local Government Pension Scheme: 

 

•  Earning over £10,000 per year 
•  Aged 22 or over and are under State Pension Age and 
•  Are not currently in a pension scheme 

 
16.  Employees that are auto-enrolled do have the opportunity to opt out.  Further 

information on auto-enrolment into the LGPS can be found at: 
http://www.yourpensionservice.org.uk 

 
 
Flexible Retirement 
 
17. 

The Local Government Pension Scheme allows scheme members aged over 55 to 
draw their retirement benefits even though they have not retired providing: 

•  The employer consents and 

•  There has been a reduction in hours or a reduction in grade equivalent to a 

minimum of 40%. 

18.  Where such a request is approved employees will receive payment of their pension 
(and lump sum if appropriate).  Employees may also continue paying into the LGPS 
to build up further benefits.  Further information is available in the Council’s Flexible 
Retirement Scheme. 

 
Contribution Rates 
 
19. 

The Local Government Pension Scheme 2013 state that employee contribution 
rates are to be banded and assessed on actual pay as at the day of assessment. 

 
20.  Casual workers who are members of the scheme will be re-banded on a monthly 

basis using exact earnings x 12 to reach an annual pensionable pay figure on which 
to base individual employee contribution rates. 

 

  27 

 
21.  All pensionable pay (including non-contractual overtime and pay protection) will be 

included in the calculation of employee contribution rates. 

 
22. 

The Council has adopted the discretion that where there is a material change in 
pensionable pay the contribution rate will be re-determined. 

 
Limitation of Payments 
 
23. 

If a person who is in receipt of a pension under the Local Government Pension 
Scheme Regulations in respect of an ill-health retirement, is re-employed within the 
Service, he/she will be subject to pension abatement rules contained in the Local 
Government Pension Scheme Regulations 1997 and the Local Government (Early 
Termination of Employee) (Discretionary Compensation) (England and Wales) 
Regulations 2000.  Where appropriate, the employee’s pension will be adjusted to 
ensure that his/her combined income will not exceed the income that would apply 
had he/she remained in the former employment. 

 
Discretions not adopted 
 
24. 

For employees with membership prior to March 2014, under the Local Government 
Pension Scheme (Benefits, Membership and Contributions) Regulations 2007, the 
Council will not award a scheme member an additional period of membership at any 
time.  This discretion has been removed from the 2014 scheme. 

 
25.  Under the Local Government Pension Scheme Regulations 2013, the Council will 

not award a scheme member an additional pension. 

 
26.  Under the Local Government (Discretionary Payments) (Injury Allowances) 
Regulations 2011 the Council will not operate an Injury Allowance Scheme. 

 
27.  Under the Local Government Pension Scheme Regulations 2013, the Council will 

not fund additional pension via a Shared Cost Additional Pension Contribution 
(SCAPC) contract, either by regular ongoing contribution or one-off lump sum. 

 
 

Note: Where an employee has had a period of unpaid additional maternity, 
paternity or adoption leave or a period of authorised unpaid leave (including the 
purchase of additional leave) and makes an election to purchase the full amount of 
the lost pension within 30 days of their return to work, the Council will fund 2/3rds of 
the cost of the purchase.  (In the case of buying additional leave the election should 
be made within 30 days of the purchase being approved) 

 
28.  Under the Local Government Pension Scheme (Transitional Provisions, Savings 

and Amendments) Regulations 2014, the Council will not apply the Rule of 85 
protection to any scheme member who wishes to voluntarily draw benefits on or 
after 55 and before age 60.  The protection aged 60 and above is subject to the 
note below. 

 

Note: In October 2006 the government removed ‘the 85 year rule’ from the pension 
scheme rules.  Members aged 60 and above who meet the Rule of 85 but who wish 
to take their pension benefits before their NPA may still have a benefit reduction 
applied subject to certain protections.  Further information on the Rule of 85 

  28 

 

protections can be found in the Protections leaflet at 
http://www.yourpensionservice.org.uk/local_government/ 
 

 
Transfer of Pensionable Service 
 
29.  New entrants to the Lancashire Scheme are advised that they have 12 months to 

request a transfer of previous service from another scheme.  Individual applications 
by employees of Burnley Borough Council for transfers into the LGPS that are 
beyond the first 12 months of active membership of the scheme are referred to the 
Head of People & Development to be dealt with under delegated powers.  The 
Head of Finance will be consulted in the use of this delegation.  The circumstances 
of each case will continue to be considered on an individual basis, but with 
reference to the following principles: 

 

 

 

 

Generally applications will only be approved if: 

•  No previous option was given to the member due to an administrative error 

(e.g. service declared but the transfer quotation had never been requested). 

•  There  has  been  an  administrative  delay  in  processing  the  initial  request, 

which was received within the initial 12 months of active membership. 

•  There are exceptional circumstances that have prevented the employee from 
exercising their option within 12 months of active membership of the scheme. 

 
 
Payment of Deferred Benefits 
 
30. 

If you leave your employment as a result of redundancy or efficiency and you are 
aged 55 or over, you will receive immediate payment of any pension benefits 
relating to that employment.  If you have previously chosen to combine an earlier 
deferred period of employment with the employment from which you are being 
made redundant, any pension you receive will be based on all your service. If, 
however, you have chosen to leave your benefits separate, any pension and lump 
sum you receive will relate only to service in the later employment. You will not 
normally be able to receive payment of any deferred benefits until your NPA.  
Further information on deferred benefits is available at 
www.yourpensionservice.org.uk 

 
Early Release of Benefits for former employees on ill-health grounds 
 
31.  Preserved benefits are payable if the authority (as the former employer) is satisfied 
(based on the opinion of a medical officer suitably qualified in occupational health) 
that the individual is permanently incapable of discharging efficiently the duties of 
his/her former employment.  In these cases there would be no ill-health 
enhancement and no reduction in benefits. 

 
32. 

The LGPS (Miscellaneous) Regulations 2012 now allow a former employee who 
has had their Tier 3 benefits suspended to request early release of their suspended 
pension benefits on ill-health grounds after age 55 and before age 60 but only if 
they are “permanently incapable of undertaking any gainful employment”.  The ill-

  29 

 

health condition can be a new condition or the same one which has deteriorated.  
The assessment will be made by the Council’s Medical Advisor.  In these cases any 
reduction in benefits could be waived at the Council’s discretion.  This decision will 
be taken by the Executive Member for Resources and Performance Management 
and Head of People and Development based on the individual circumstances. 

 
Policy for Release of Benefits on Compassionate Grounds 
 
33.  Preserved benefits (other than for ill health cases) would only be released if an ex-
employee's personal circumstances are such that the Authority agrees that he/she 
is prevented from working by the need to provide full-time care for a 
husband/wife/partner/son/daughter who is suffering from a terminal or chronic 
illness and this results in financial hardship for the family.   

 
 

 
 

The decision to release preserved benefits on compassionate grounds will be taken 
by the Head of People & Development in consultation with the Head of Finance and 
Executive Member for Resources and Performance Management. 

In these circumstances any reduction in benefits could be waived at the Council’s 
discretion.  This decision will be taken by the Head of People & Development in 
consultation with the Head of Finance and Executive Member for Resources and 
Performance Management. 

 
 
Pension Tax Relief 
 
34.  With effect from April 2014 the annual allowance for tax relief purposes is £40,000.  
This means that employees who receive a significant pay increase may need to pay 
tax on any contributions in excess of the annual allowance.  This is only likely to 
affect higher earners but the Council recommends that employees who think they 
may exceed the annual allowance seek specialist advice from an independent 
financial advisor.  Further information on the calculation of annual allowances can 
be found at www.yourpensionservice.org.uk 

 
 
Further Information 
 
35. 

Further information on the payment of pension benefits outlined in this statement 
can be obtained from the People and Development Unit (ext 7124). 

 
36.  Your Pensions Service administer the Local Government Pension Scheme on 

behalf of Burnley Borough Council and can be contacted on 0300 123 6717 
(helpdesk) or by email AskPensions@localpensionspartnership.org.uk or via the 
website www.yourpensionservice.org.uk 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Statement of Pensions Policy August 2017 VW.HB 

  30 

Appendix H 

 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 

Gender Pay Gap Report 

March 2018 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

  31 

 
 
 
Foreword 
 
The Equality Act 2010 (Specific Duties and Public Authorities) Regulations 2017 requires 
public sector organisations with 250 or more employees to publish information to 
demonstrate how large the pay gap is between their male and female employees.  I can 
confirm that our data has been calculated according to the requirements of the Equality 
Act 2010. 
 
 
Mick Cartledge 
Chief Executive 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

  32 

 
 
Background 
 
The information contained within this report is based on a snapshot date of 31 March 
2017.  At this date our workforce comprised of 56% male and 44% female employees. 
 
For the purposes of reporting the gender pay gap, all permanent, temporary and casual 
employees are included in the total workforce figure of 262. 
 
This analysis looks at the gender pay differences within Burnley Council, focusing on the 
overall pay difference between the male and female workforce.  A positive pay gap 
indicates that men are paid more, a negative pay gap indicates that women are paid more. 
 
The gender pay gap is different to equal pay.  Equal pay relates to men and women 
receiving equal pay for equal work and not meeting this requirement is unlawful.  The 
Council operates job evaluation schemes to ensure that work of equal value is paid at the 
same rate.  The gender pay gap is a measure of any disparity in pay between the average 
earnings of males and females. 
 
The regulations require us to report on: 
 
Mean gender pay gap 

The difference between the mean hourly rate of pay 
of male full-pay relevant employees and that of 
female full-pay relevant employees 
 

Median gender pay gap  The difference between the median hourly rate of pay 

Mean bonus gap 

Median bonus gap 

Bonus proportions 

Quartile pay bands 

of male full-pay relevant employees and that of 
female full-pay relevant employees 
The difference between the mean bonus pay paid to 
male relevant employees and that paid to female 
relevant employees 
The difference between the median bonus pay paid 
to male relevant employees and that paid to female 
relevant employees 
The proportions of male and female relevant 
employees who were paid bonus pay 
The proportions of male and female full pay relevant 
employees in the lower, lower middle, upper middle 
and upper quartile pay bands 

 
The overall gender pay gap is defined as the difference between the median (actual mid-
point) or mean (average) basic annual earnings of men and women expressed as a 
percentage of the median or mean basic annual earnings of men. 
 

  33 

 
 
Gender Pay Gap – 31 March 2017 
 
Mean 
 
Average hourly rate of pay and the percentage difference between 
 

 

 

 

GAP 

 

2.3% 
£0.34 

 

 

Burnley Council’s 
mean gap is lower 
than the national 
average of 18.1%* 

 

£14.44 

£14.78 

 
 
 
* Annual Survey of hours and Earnings 2017 (Office for National Statistics) 
 
 
Median 
 
Middle hourly rate of pay and the percentage difference between 
 

 

 

 

GAP 

 

7.9% 
£1.13 

 

 

 

Burnley Council’s 

median gap is 
lower than the 

national average 

of 18.4%* 

£13.07 

£14.20 

 
 
 
* Annual Survey of hours and Earnings 2017 (Office for National Statistics) 
 
 
Bonus Gap 
 
Burnley Council does not operate any performance related pay or bonus scheme and 
therefore has no bonus gender pay gap 
 
 
 
Quartile Pay Bands 
 

  34 

 
These graphs show the workforce composition in each pay quartile.  The proportions in the 
lower and lower middle pay quartiles do generally reflect our gender workforce profile.  
However, there are more men in the upper quartiles. 
 

 

 

 
 
 

 

 

  35 

 
 
Analysis 
 
 

•  Latest figures suggest that the median gender pay gap across the public sector is 

19.4% and the figure across all industries in Lancashire is 12%.  The Council 
compares favourably with these statistics. 

•  The Regulations require the hourly rate to be calculated as ordinary pay which 
includes basic pay and allowances as well as deductions for benefits provided 
through salary sacrifice schemes.  It does not include overtime payments or 
pension contributions. 
Burnley Council operates salary sacrifice schemes for childcare vouchers and the 
purchase of bicycles.  It also allows employees to purchase up to 10 days additional 
leave per year.  The gender proportion of our employees who take-up these 
benefits is below: 

 
Childcare Vouchers 
Cycle Scheme 
Bought Additional leave 

Male 
2.7% 
2.7% 
3.4% 

Female 
7.8% 
0.9% 
14.8% 

Participation in these schemes does result in a lower reported hourly rate and as 
more women than men take advantage of these it could have a disproportionate 
effect on the calculations.  Calculating the hourly rate before taking any allowances 
or deductions into account results in a mean gender pay gap of 1.2% and a median 
gender pay gap of 3.1%. 

•  As at the snapshot date of 31 March 2017, 40% of our senior management team 

were female. 

 

 

 

 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

  36 

 
 
Taking Action 
 
Burnley Council is committed to fair pay irrespective of gender.  We already have the 
following in place: 
 

•  Support for employees through application of flexible working policies 
•  An anonymised recruitment process where all equality monitoring information 

(including that related to gender) is removed to reduce the potential for unconscious 
bias 

•  Learning and development programme which provides employees with opportunity 

to meet their full potential eg. Talent Management.  Our 2018 cohort comprises of 
66% female and 33% male. 

 
We will prioritise the following areas for action: 
 

•  Explore how we can attract more women into our organisation to create a more 

even gender balance across the grading structure.  As an equal opportunities 
employer, we firmly believe in appointing the best candidate into the role, 
regardless of their gender or other factors covered by the Equality Act. 

•  We will continue to actively encourage flexible working across the organisation to 

ensure that all employees have the opportunity to work in a way that works for their 
career aspirations and work/life balance. 

 
 

  37 

